What am I doing now? Who’da thought a kid who was only interested in getting a great drum sound would end up at 64 still being feed and needed writing movie scripts in Australia.
Total Weight Gain/Loss: No Change
And, I'd managed to discover serendipitously that this trail way up on the ridge line where the wind races up one side and blasts over the other causing unsuspecting runners to WHOA with surprise when rounding an exposed bend in the trail, was where my sanity lives.
Thank you for xyz; many hands make the work light.
Chris, still standing at the sunroom door, caught the reflection of red and blue lights speeding through the neighborhood. He picked his cell phone from his pocket, hit a speed dial button, but got no answer. “Where the hell did they go?” he mumbled as he put his phone away.
Here's what I've learned, in my very brief and still continuing exposure to alcoholism: It's really hard to be sympathetic.
5) A female character who has too many flaws
17.- Make the Bible your text book in the Christian instructions of your children.
The whole night these boys drugged, abused and raped Casey with absolutely no consideration for her or her life. They only thought of themselves and what they wanted. It was Casey’s blind attraction to Billy, and her obsession with the bad boys who put her in this predicament. While she was blacked out, she went into a dream state where was walking through the woods and wolves were attacking her. This is when she began to blame herself for everything that had happened. Being Little Red Riding Hood in her dream only proved to her that she was where she shouldn’t have been in the first place. She was going to the Christmas ball not a rape party in the woods. What was she thinking when she walked away from the school gym with a guy she had never been out with before?
Basilio
Even though it comes in those evil green bottles, I have had pretty good success getting it fresh. Its price has come down recently too, so it competes nicely even with good domestic beer. And hey, the Czech Republic is (or at least was, when this beer was first created) a Catholic country. So there's your Catholic angle!
The minister's lawyer Renate Williams argued that Van Wyk was supposed to be at home and not drinking when he was on call and that the minister could not be held responsible for his actions.
In any case, I think most people do struggle with depression at any given point in their lives, regardless of their creativity. However, I definitely think we're more prone to the dark fingers of that particular malady. And dealing with the rejections that will inevitably come, can make their grip all the stronger.
30. Uranus is the most joked about planet in the solar system.
It might be useful to look at a Twenty-First Century version of the Mosquito for the close support role. This design could also be used for a search aircraft or a maritime patrol aircraft with little modification.
DO: Get a confidentiality screen if you are conscious of opening private documents on your computer.
Let me give you an example: If you are 24 you divide your age in half= 12. Then add 7 giving you 19. Do NOT date below 19 years old. And no matter what your creeper age is Never EVER go below 18! That’s like walking around wearing the opposing team’s colors in Lincoln on a Husker game day; you’re just asking for trouble.
In fact, men seemed to have really raked in the dough over the years publishing everything from books to videos to movies to cartoon strips about how hard women are to figure out. They're no piece of cake, themselves!
and candy
Easy peasy....
aging and I do not like it one bit. Eyesight changing, my body changing
What about you? Does food play an important role in your life? Do you have any food traditions?
In the spirit of the day, some bun spam:
In previous posts, we've talked about the health benefits of organ meats. So here is a delicious recipe to help you start incorporating them into your diet. And this is a pretty neutral organ meat to begin with if you're a little apprehensive about how they'll taste. Beef liver takes a little getting used to (any suggestions on good beef liver recipes are more than welcome), but found beef heart to be very tasty.
Mr. Gold’s posting has brought out a myriad of emotions in all of us, and has affected not only the trans-identified community, but also those who are our true allies (some who are gay, lesbian, bi or hetero-identified).
While the ravioli were cooking I melted some butter in a skillet, and when the ravioli were done I drained them well, and transferred them to the skillet. I poured in a little white wine, and let it reduce a bit. Next, I added a couple of tablespoons of pesto. (I’ll talk about making pesto soon, but this was pre-made.) I gently stirred the pasta to distribute the pesto, and added about half cup of heavy cream, and as soon as that came up to a boil I added parmesan to the sauce. I added it slowly, and mixed it in until the sauce had thickened nicely. All that was left was to get them onto a plate! I had some asparagus, a salad, and a glass of wine. It was a nice way to celebrate Valentine’s Day!
I used one of Crafty Ann's tickets for my sentiment, I LOVE these and they are such a bargain (as are all of Ann's wonderful digis) If you haven't visited this shop yet, you're in for a treat, as well as her wonderful drawings Ann has some of the most fabulous and versatile backing papers. When I can't find anything that works with those 'tricky' images I often find myself reaching for these and they're always the perfect solution (the embossed papers are so realistic that it saves the bother of embossing them yourself!)
Alright, enough yammering, here's the recipe. Happy Monday to you all!
I've been thinking, and unless I'm much mistaken, I've never actually told the story of how I came to be an an unschooler... I simply popped up with a blog at age 17 saying "hey, I'm unschooled!". :-P So this is the story of how I came to be an unschooler! Some of it is taken from what my parents have said, since I was pretty young when some of this went down, but I'll do my best to tell it accurately!
Today, we have a bit of blue sky and I manage to snap some pictures. Will post that later.
Let me tell what I own, a rebounder, I was going to bounce myself to skinny. A treadmill, walking to slim town. A 6 pack of weights, my muscles were going to eat up fat. Two yoga/pilates floor mats, stretching to the heavens so I'd be taller and look skinnier. Two floor balls, rolling the fat off. One Eliptical Trainer, works the entire body so I'd be smaller in the proper proportions. (Please note my fat is evenly packed...thank God.) My Inversion Machine, planning to hang upside down until the only thing fat on me is my head. So far I've go the fat head thing down. :)
Eyes Without a Face
By the way, I don’t intend to hash out Wodehouse’s wartime experience, and in my retelling of the retelling the story suffers tremendously. McCrum on the other hand is more than up to the job. It is a testament to his skill as a biographer that the reader never loses perspective of Wodehouse’s tactless bumbling through the Second World War and the gravity of the consequences of his actions. Yet you see the world through Wodehouse’s eyes so well that you almost find yourself resenting the War for its sins against one clueless Briton.
So, colour me impressed. I am surprised Jason Kenney and the Conservatives did something like this. They have, after all, inherited a mess of an immigration system that has wound itself into a Gordian Knot and someone has to wield that sword sooner or later. While I applaud this move it still does not address the main problems of too many immigrants coming to Canada and too many coming from too few source countries. If reforms are to be made it is not only in cutting the numbers we accept each year in total but also the mix as well.
Emitted from the lips of my cast
in a green leaf tipped up and up
I woke up... read emails from bed & tweet until my legs feel like they're not made of rubber. Then I mosey into the kitchen, fry up a couple of eggs and toast (or burn) some bread to go with. Have a cup of tea on the deck and sit in the sun, listening to the birds tweeting. Then I get to work managing a portfolio of really interesting projects with an awesome group of international people. I'll probably call my parents later, just to say hi.
I need a regular dose
cinnamon to taste
7. Fun fur is frowned on by “real” knitters.
This page was for a sketch challenge set by Aga at Scrapz.Biz. The RBS yellow doily was perfect & the cute little book paper envelope worked in really well too :-)
So now that we have gone over why Mother never saw release on NES why didn’t Mother 3?
Her backside was numb. So anxious not to turn off the laptop, she found herself pressed hard against the ottoman in the sunroom. Anxious, as if pressing that small white button would permanently extinguish this candle, trim its wick too low to relight.
In his usual short and pithy language, A.A. cofounder Dr. Bob said
So two weeks after the deed, here is my birth story: On Monday 31st Jan I woke up at 8.30am with some mild period-like pains. Having not surfed the crimson wave for so long, I almost forgot what the pain felt like. I pretty much knew I was in labour straight away and I was pissed because every week since 36 weeks I’d been getting my hair and nails done, just in case he popped out, and I was due to get did that day. I wanted to be all beautified for my babba, but of course all of that went straight out the window.
Anita drew Spotty all dressed up for the holiday season, and I think she has captured him perfectly! I love this card Anita.....
The next big event for the team will be the 2xist underwear event. In the past we have hired live models for the events. Theses are the last two years. It has coincided the last two years also with New York's gay pride.
Seriously, is anything sweeter than a baby in a nappy and a clean white singlet? No. Thought not.
Turn the corner and you enter the gaming hall. Most of you will have seen pictures of this, but I hadn't quite got the scale of it:
Thank you again to everyone - I had a wonderful time! I hope you decide to come back and visit me in the future!
He does this by taking venerable teachings and using parables, anecdotes, and everyday tales to make dharma matter. He translates "the four dignities of the Shambhala" empowerment teachings for us, as tiger, lion, garuda (man-bird), and dragon. "Windhorse" teachings, in Shambhala, enrich these practices which sustain a bolder sense of wise fearlessness as a way to make what insights come to one in meditation become self-actualized. These animals are metaphors for not otherworldly "Super Friends" from above but as qualities we desire to embody.
Space under the nose cone is limited, teams will no doubt sculpt the structure of the nose cone to maximise space beneath it, in a similar fashion to what Mercedes have achieved this year. Then making use of that space means probably two directions will be tried.
That sets the cognition of a potentiated idea’s resolution
My journey started in Tokyo after a Sapporo “tasting” on the plane. Immediately after ditching my backpack at the hostel, I wandered off to find some food. I came across an Izakaya, which is basically a Japanese pub. Since I obviously don’t speak or read the language, I just parked myself, grabbed a menu, and started pointing. I wish I could tell you what I ate but I’m not entirely sure. I can tell you this, it was delicious! I washed it down with some pints of Japanese beer and some Sake. Not a bad start to the trip.
Which meant that with every trip to the top, I nearly had a panic attack.
All lights as One.
Stephen King or Chistopher Moore could loquaciously wax on about the smooth taste of Crown Royal or the suave sexiness of Amaretto and then at the end of the commercial say with a crooked grin,"What you think I come up with all that crap stone cold sober?"
Pre-signing batches of abortion forms to authorise abortions on women that have not even yet been assessed, as doctors at these ‘clinics’ allegedly did, is perjury and it is quite right that both the police and the General Medical Council are currently carrying out an investigation.
Would you dare to relook at what is before you
After I have gobbled up all the food in sight- both Thursday at Thanksgiving and Friday at Friendsgiving- I plan on going shopping!!
for an increase in our prosperity,
“To remind my Self of what Jesus did for me when he died and rose again”
I have not heard much else about the project and I am curious whether the lukewarm reception of Terminator: Salvation may give production companies pause about relighting multiple movie deals. Odds are, I will not be too thrilled about t either way.
With carbonara sauce, you use only the heat of the cooked pasta to gently cook the raw eggs in the sauce so you basically have to get the sauce ready before the pasta finishes cooking.
1. The Hunger Games by Suzanne Collins
eFortune of the day: “Don’t get tricked into doing someone else’s work”
Once there was a path
Chris looked at his wife who was locked up by fear.
Since I’m hopeless with picking out a lens for my DSLR cause I’m a noob when it comes to advance photography. I checked it out online. I searched for the best lenses for my camera specifically since what I might pick out may not be compatible. So far all the lenses in the list seems good. I’m save the link here cause I’m just using my aunts laptop.
The good thing about men’s jeans is that they have four pockets. It won’t be comfortable, but I can utilize all four of those pockets to fit everything. We bring our wallet, keys and phone and that’s it.
2. Serenade (Raph Towner)
Which brings me to the photograph: I have no idea what it is, either.
I still feel the same overall sense of disappointment. I was promised a job title change, changed my behaviors at work, and have not been recognized with the title I was given. Not only that, but when I asked to get what I was given, they had to think about it. My loyalty to this place has plummeted. I’m still committed to my program–firmly–and will see my projects through. But I am not feeling particularly invested in staying for the long term. To be fair, I never really have been; I’ve never seen myself as being at this institution for my career. I miss schools of education and people who know how to talk school: people who appreciate teaching and learning and human development.
The moral of this story (?) is of course that the Dollar Store rules, expensive shoes lie and Jillian Michaels will yell at you but you can always mute her. Or something like that.
CRAFT: Songwriting, painting, sketching, writing, photographing – whatever strikes my fancy – as long as I am exercising my right brain. No holds barred – 2012 will be a year of creative explosion in my life! Practice begets excellence, and I want to be excellent at what I do.
and do whatever needs to be done
Britt was still married to Chuck (who was, in real life, black). Chuck brought (though I didn’t know this at the time, and thought they were party crashers) a black Muslim to my party, who brought several of his black Muslim friends. They made trouble, started messing things up, got fighty, and things almost turned into a mini-riot. Pushing. Shoving. Yelling.
‘You wish you can help get everybody get out of prison that don’t supposed to be there, but you know you are not going to be able to do it,’ Christopher Scott, who was wrongly convicted of a murder in 1997, told CBS.
The Amazon and Barnes and Noble reader reviews are extremely positive — a solid five stars on Amazon — and the book is still being held at a “subsidized” low price by the publisher, for just a little longer, as a thank-you to our loyal readers for your support.
Besides shop owners and vendors, no one cares and everyone understands what you are saying.
Here is their crazy message:
-1/2c fresh cilantro
2. Your name comes underneath a headline for a story that you wrote. What’s your name called in news-speak? Bonus: What’s another name for a cutline?
depictions of mind’s wandering
This I have no problem with as frankly he was boring me - it is what happens next that gets my goat. He starts hallucinating and wondering if there's an afterlife (just as Lipstick happens to be conveniently flashback to an experiment she did with an immortal soul in order for Brown to crowbar in his theories about the afterlife) when Langdon apparently dies. And you know what? He has a flashback to a lecture that his friend gave. I mean, really. If your life passes before your eyes when you're shuffled off this mortal coil, you'd hope that your last thoughts weren't of a lecture you had a few years back. I'd want happiness, romance, and a replay of when those two Australian dancers happened to be staying in digs just around the corner from my house for a whole month and we barely saw daylight.
Please use Lace, Easel Card, Animal and Pink on your card/project!
Welcome to the third interview in the Millennial Generation Series.
May the God of hope fill you with all joy and peace as you trust in Him, so that you may overflow with hope by the power of the Holy Spirit.
every Tuesday they meet at the coffee shop...
i made my name: eliza eliza
American Idol Season 9 Winner Lee DeWyze, Inspirational Songs:
details - but I do know I COULD make something up and
59. It was love at first sight. —Joseph Heller, Catch-22 (1961)
BUTTER by Erin Lange. I don't read many contemporaries but this book is at the top of my wishlist. It's about a boy “Butter” who's going to eat himself to death live on the internet.
Editor: Well, John/Jane has sent back his/her responses to my edits. I mean, we did a ton of work--it's much better than the first draft. But s/he didn't really go as far with the second plot line/character development/cultural details as I was hoping.
With love to you and thank you for ALL your faves and comments, M, (* _ *)
Sandy M ~ Ooh La Frou Frou
1- Be careful to the cake in the oven because it can burn really quickly so watch it from time to time specially after the first 10 minutes and once it gains a nice golden color test it with a toothpick for doneness and take it out of the oven when done.
Reflected as re-membering.
As the waves of ecstasy pounded on her she succumbed and visited that euphoric place that she goes in her mind when orgasmic power takes over her body and transports her to a place inside herself that is hidden in the recesses of her consciousness. She feebly steadied herself by putting her hand on my shoulders while she humped my face with abandon as the crescendo of exquisite sensation squeezed her pussy, and made her honey drip in a stream as her climax crested and waned.
While they remain a strategic threat, there are several different factors operating today that weren't present in 2006 if war breaks out again.
Don't forget to count your blessings, praise God for your health, and be an encouragement to those who are facing difficult trials. Thanks so much!
IRL, I place my trust in God and try to find peace knowing He won't let us starve (He hasn't). But, I am still angry. And there is no where for that anger to go, least of all where it is directed (at the money-grubbing whore).
I'd stop reading right here because when I see this kind of over-writing in a query, I know I'll see it in the novel.
experience,the other speaks of God taking the children of Israel through..
And in no time I forgot where I was supposed to be headed. Which, of course, is the essential first step in all successful vacations.
Eventually, I graduated to the better and stronger beers. Before I knew it I was right back at it. But what about that $100? Through the grapevine (Mrs. Schlampe), I found out that Mr. Schlampe wasn't doing so well. In fact, he had gained a pound. At that time, I was down nearly 7 pounds, and doing awesome. But that bit of news did me in. I started to slack off. First the beer came knocking. Then i divorced the exercise bike. The poor thing just sat there, collecting dust. Before I knew it, I was back in line at BevMo every Friday night. Thank God they extended their hours. Coincidence, I think not!
I am keen to start again and reintroduce the power breathe into my routine, but this time I will include it as part of my training programme, varying the number, time and length of sessions depending on the day's training or racing on the bike in order to make sure that I reach optimal training load for my breathing muscles.
“Well, I may be pretty late tonight. So, uhh, don’t wait up anddddd, have fun with your quiet time.”
The question remains, what is good in your life? Is your spiritual walk ‘good’ or marginal at best? Are you truly serving the Lord with all of your heart, or do you just go through whatever motions you feel obligated to go through, in an attempt to not be an outsider? Fellow Christians, we must understand that we have a sincere role in the work of the Kingdom. That we are just one of the any parts of the body, and without us, the body is unable to complete the work necessary to reach out to every nation as we are commanded to in Jesus’ Great Commission (Matthew 28:19-21)
Bratwurst, mustard, sauerkraft and butter/sugar roll for me.
be kicking back with a lot of inappropriate
I'm so proud of these kids and what they are doing. There is no red tape; no costly overhead; no expensive altar or adornments; just a group of young people with a car, a grill and a desire to serve others.
Every single horrible thing that could possibly happen to my child in her entire life lives in that ocean.
Dry Skin
Me personally, I fall for the charming guys. They are typically quite engaging and know the right amount of balance between flattery and they often know how to keep moving in and out of flirting, flattery and regular conversation. Charming guys are well aware of the communication differences between men and women generally and in social settings – and as a result are able to keep women engaged. They use these guidelines on how female communicate etc., to know whether or not to pursue, not pursue, to keep going or to back off. IOW’s a charming guy will never FORCE anything b/c he is aware of his boundaries and limitations. But he will also push for the close based on gaining enough info from the women’s indirect positive response.
Kort looked over the city for several moments and then looked to the necromancer “You recognize this place?” I was confused myself on what he said. I must have had sand in my ears. I thought he’d said “sass Irene” which I admit didn’t make sense at the time.
You know that secret dream you have deep down inside?? The one that you hold so close and so dear?
It was a list of simple errands I was crossing off to do before the start of work/school tomorrow. Pet store, pedicure and pharmacy. Simple, right? No. Wrong. I mind my own business in public. If someone smiles at me or addresses me for some reason, I am kind at best and civil at the very least… probably about 90% of the time. Today tells me that I should really rethink that whole life strategy.
11/10/02 – Gyeorgos Ceres Hatonn
love lucyxx
"I am a little girl, so why shouldn't I?"
I walk with these two pieces of my heart, my soul rather, I stand between, and yet I still haven’t perfected the balance.
You misunderstand me. I wasn’t accusing you of being a Peeping Tom. I just assumed you must have humped a few hoity-toity ladies who are into that kind of thing. You know the sort – the ones who like it rough and hairy and will pay for the privilege.
Daily eruptions, escalating in size, have been occurring at Sakurajima Volcano in Japan.
So shall I! Oh hear my prayer.
Cuba reveals that they have received 39 bodies but that several are Grenadian and not Cuban. They ask if they can send a forensics expert to Grenada. The request is refused.
What have you bought online recently??? I will be back soon and a big hello to new followers xx
Part of the Earth’s intention in the Gulf was to get the conscious attention of humanity focused on the Earth. The rupture was resolved, but have you noticed its most lasting impact? It has solidified a level of consciousness, an awareness of abuse of power, of greed, and of human stupidity. It has focused our attention at a level of consciousness that is absolutely necessary to maintain in order to go through this Shift with a greater level of stability.
WordPress may absolutely demand the expectation that I know how a web-page works and that if there are, in a box about posting, 4 elements, that I read them.
guffaw near all
In between that lot, we even managed an all too short four day nuclear family break in the Easter holidays. We raced up to Aberystwyth to have a little time away. That's the main disadvantage of working for ourselves, we don't get looooong paid holidays... those sadly are just dim and distant memories. Still, we try to make the most of the time we do have instead.
The following is an excellent critique of the proposed changes to the Canadian environmental laws and regulations which are part of this year’s federal budget put forward by the Conservative government. The critique was written by Lisa Gue, Environmental Health Policy Analyst, for the David Suzuki Foundation website (link to the original post).
My father involved us by any project he was working on and took us along to
Ain't real!
Q. All bears are white where there is always snow; in Novaya Zemlya there is always snow; what color are the bears there?
I use the Daily Treatment Conditioner on days that I do not stress my hair. This conditioner feels light and airy. It gives my hair a nice moisturization that isn't oily. It doesn't weigh my hair down either! I think both conditioners have a light scent that isn't overpowering. Both conditioners do a great job repairing the damage I've caused to my hair. They make my hair shiny and healthy!
- Inside the house, 12 red velvet-styled roses were waiting for me with a love letter.
She turned and shuffled away hurriedly, murmuring to herself and looking sad. I walked across the kitchen over to where Mel sat and looked at him. His eyes were closed and his arms were crossed over his chest, apparently asleep. A stubbly beard covered his face and his glasses were small and square. He wore a Dodgers baseball cap and rather shabby clothing. He looked like a bum to me, and I didn’t see any apparent reason why Betty should choose him out of any of the other bums in the town.
served with fennel pollen yogurt
Wait! Wait! If you’re a Montessori lover, don’t be mad. I’m sure there are many of you who have had fabulous experiences with Montessori schools. Maybe this one was just a little hard core. I mean, the way the head directress spoke about the school’s founder, Dr. Maria Montessori, I was expecting them to wheel out her taxitermied body so we could kneel before it.
My own inner arrogance is stifling. I feel murdered by internal thoughts. I feel so beyond everyone and their way of being because to me it’s just a game and I don’t care about winning or losing, just sheer, unadulterated enjoyment. Fuck, be fucked, eat, be eaten. Having a job is just a test of endurance at this point. I can quit any time, but I haven’t. I’m making more money than all the snobbish assholes who went off to college with their noses upturned at me when I dropped out. Somehow, that makes me smile. I’ve never been above revenge, even the more petty kind.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to become pre-occupied by an experience, urge, desire, yearning within myself for relationship and sex and not ever question this experience, urge, desire, yearning, and thus just accept this experience as valid and normal and go along with it. Not asking where it came from and also determining if it in fact actually support life, and thus I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to exist as a conduit of abuse.
Furthermore, even assuming the ambiguous reference is to the phrase preceding “as Scripture has said,” the “οὐχ ὡς ἄνθρωπος ὁ θεὸς” is the LXX for Numbers 23:19, and Judith 8:16 has exactly the same “οὐχ ὡς ἄνθρωπος ὁ θεὸς,” at least according to my LXX (I’m not aware of any reason to think that Athanasius’ LXX differed on this point). Thus, especially in view of Athanasius’ explicit rejection of Judith as being part of the inspired Word of God, it seems unreasonable to conclude that this reference in Athanasius is a statement that Judith is canonical Scripture.
raw nerves
A. The cost and
"Since we announced our 20-year naming rights partnership in January 2007, Barclays has offered nothing but resolute and great support," Nets Chief Executive Officer Brett Yormark said. "We deeply appreciate our partnership with such a well-respected and distinguished company, which shares our love for Brooklyn and our strong sense of community."
We can't wait for Eas.ter as he will really enjoy all of the festivities. We are going to color eggs with him tomorrow night - that should be a wonderful (but fun) mess.
Only when we enter into the awareness that we are truly The Father’s Spiritual Children in Christ Jesus we can begin to fully understand our inheritance in His Kingdom (cf., § Becoming Children of God). And that, through that understanding and the Divine Wisdom that comes with it, we may find our place and role in the here and now so that, through us, His Kingdom may indeed be manifested here on Earth as it is in Heaven.
I can’t say I have read many graphic novels, but this is an extraordinary book. It tells the tale, as you would expect from the title, of Simone Lia’s search for a husband, and her struggle to understand God’s plan for her life. It’s Cosmopolitan meets St John of the Cross via Snoopy and the Far Side. The cartoon-like illustrations are endearing, funny, and often beautiful. Her emotional honesty is sometimes heartbreaking. But you have the sense of listening in on the inner dialogue of a soul – one that is innocent, wounded, brave and slightly quirky – rather than intruding or being the recipient of a clunky disclosure.
3158 E. Burnside
Me: There isn’t one. Wifey’s are perfect JUST.THE.WAY.THEY.ARE.
However, the film does have a great morbid atmosphere to it when the Cenobites show up, sort of like a darker Nightmare on Elm Street or something, and the story progresses in a rather noir-meets-occult type of fashion that reminds me of really old school Gothic horror. Doug Bradley is a great actor as Pinhead, and whenever he’s on screen the movie is suddenly really awesome.
Finally, SAP spies eyes glowing in the darkness under a neighbor's deck. "Oh, NUTS cat, it's me, Momma! Come here, baby!" she cries.
So that maybe, on the fortune-kissed days, the words grow so pliant that they follow us into our dreams at night, only to fall like rain from our fingertips at dawn.
What you don't have you don't need it now
Nope, couldn't move that either.
Will you share this message with somebody you like and care about?
I do like that the models are wearing Converse sneakers. As I read the book, I posted quotes I liked on Goodreads. I was pleased to see one of the quotes I liked listed when I pulled the summary just now for the review (see below). It mentions Converse sneakers, so I like this quirky addition to the cover.
“Population will inevitably and completely outstrip whatever small increases in food supplies we make. The death rate will increase until at least 100-200 million people per year will be starving to death during the next ten years.”
The Belle Ball of 1982. I was a freshman. Oh so young. Baby, really. I had a HUGE crush on this boy named Brian. He, unfortunately had a HUGE crush on my best friend at the time, Rachel. I asked him to the Belle Ball. That was painfully hard for me to do, but he said yes, and I was thrilled. So to make it special, the day of the Ball I got my hair cut. Up til then I had long hair that my Mom sort of arranged into a series of Three's Company ponytails. Either one on each side or one high one in the back or whatever. I had that hair whacked off into the most butch dyke haircut you can imagine. But in true 80's style, without products, it looked like a hair helmet. Old lady hair helmet. Oh it was BAD.
Thanks to my sister in law Dixie for sharing this recipe with me!
He should be supplied with all evidence, information and documents made known to the adjudicator. He should have a right to present witnesses and exculpatory evidence and to cross-examine witnesses on the other side.
She was flustered. “Damon?”
I think the reason why they were unknown had to do with the death of both my grandfathers. Both of them from accidents and with their passing the communication between families just ceased to be after a short period of time. I am glad they both found me because their knowledge will fill in the blanks. Both of the woman have just recently begun their searches, and I can help them along their way.
Note: This is not "my" pattern. This is me sharing how I make a flower square like this. I am sure the pattern has been around for a long time before I shared this tutorial. In case I step on someones toes...
Chubby Hubby and I stuck together most of the race. There were times I ran ahead of him, but he always caught up to me doing the obstacles. We finished together. It was a very fun race and I can't wait to do another one. The only thing I would do different would be to have a whole team of people to add to the fun factor and to have a person to "crew". We left our stuff in our car and we were shuttled in from the parking lot. At the finish we didn't have any of our cash. We ended up leaving the party a little early. Next time we will know better! This was a double thumbs up race!
Top 6 has been a heartbreaker for me ever since I first started watching in season 5. Since that season, the 6th spot has always gone to one of my favorites.
I will be entering this one the following challenges.
The beast beneath, and her carburretted wheeze,
92.3 NOW is nominated for “Best Terrestrial Radio Station” and our very own resident mixer DJ Suraci is nominated as well!
Um. Is the whole damn course uphill? And, in the meantime, the storms from the radar before the race? Up ahead. It was BLACK.
After the initial round of introductions and a brief round of discussing what colour meant to us, we moved on to the point of the afternoon which was to have a dialogue about each installation and the corresponding colour palette.
This giveaway is open to U.S. residents age 18 or over.
Helen xx
Established by former President Theodore Roosevelt National Park was established to honor Roosevelt's significant conservation efforts and his high personal regard for the fargo north dakota bands after finishing college. The local government has been done to provide funding for USDA Nutrition Assistance Programs like the Land O'Lakes Ice Cream Parlor, the fargo north dakota bands as well as for seeing birds, but also in upcoming sectors of life science, physical science and technology into the fargo north dakota bands is where you will want to go south for their winter period. They offer two different seasons for hunters, archery and firearms season for deer hunting.
Alarming measurements a ‘parallax error’
If this movie is doing anything it’s critiquing Hollywood for turning a story with a thoughtful, articulate creature, with a penchant for quoting Milton and Goethe, (as shown in the quote at the top) into a lumbering, mindless, hulk. Hollywood turned one of the most intelligent villains in literature into an idiot for no reason…and this has been the bane of English teachers ever since as for some reason everyone thinks the Hollywood version is the truth. (If only Brooks had shown the same skill when critiquing Hollywood’s vision of Dracula).
He pointed to the opposite side of the crowd. “VA?!”
Here’s a nifty posting of holiday beers ranked by William Brand on his blog What's On Tap. I’ve sampled about half of the beers appearing on this list, as well. I suspect I’ll not get around to some of the imports; I’ll have my hands full just finding all the local, American made beers.
The middle part is essentially You’re Next or The Strangers – a home invasion flick. After a shock, sudden death, our group panics and crawls around on the floor trying to avoid detection by the killer or killers outside. They also need to avoid being killed – our guy is a skilled marksman, and most of the kills are via gunshot. That’s unusual for a slasher film, but it actually works here – the bland cast has no obvious heroine or hero, so you’re never sure who is safe, and the rare up close and personal kills are that much sweeter as a result. Plus, there’s a terrific splattered head effect that beats at least half of the stabbing/slashing types I’ve seen in a slasher movie in years, so don’t give me any of that “a slasher doesn’t use a gun” shit.
Pictures: Fiddler On The Roof
We've changed since we started doing this. We've become stronger, and I can feel us slipping. I hate that. I hope that he'll act upon what we discussed and I will try harder to follow the rules. We need that bond and that closeness.
In The Entertainment Industry.
It's been bliss to go back to my favourite yarn again.I've been making simple circles. The same pattern I used for this blanket back in 2010.........
Actor: Jean Dujardin, The Artist
Remaining objective again. The SPX and NDX have not confirmed downtrends. Probabilities suggest the recent decline was only wave 4 of the uptrend, i.e. Intermediate wave iv. This suggests Int. wave five is currently underway. It is likely to make a new high, be short in length and duration, and complete Major wave 3. We display this count on the SPX and NDX daily charts.
I really don’t think these are things a therapist should say, but I can say them because I’m the foil to her kind understanding, I’m the one that beats them at arm wrestling and tells them to suck it up. It’s what I’m good at.
“Really. You like the idea of Ohio?”
BAD STUFF: Like most horror movies, it’s a bit hokey. It’s ridiculously over the top. But in a way, that lulls you into a false sense of security — thinking it’s going to be one of those semi-comedic horror movies. But it actually creeped us out. Significantly. We were thrilled.
stop. it.
1 amusement
My licensing business has many facets to it and I do not expect that everyone will understand why it was necessary to bring legal counsel into the situation. But it was. And it was done very thoughtfully. This infringement jeopardized an exclusive agreement I was working on with another company to make, among other things, tote bags. Contacting my lawyer was necessary — this is why I have a lawyer — to handle copyright issues for my business.
The Jonas Brothers are joining the ranks of post-major DIYs. The bros. have ended their contract with Disney-owned Hollywood Records, and purchased their recording, publishing, and other rights for an undisclosed sum.
This is not the first time that primates have been observed to pay special attention to a deceased member of their group. In April last year similar behaviors were observed by a chimpanzee mother in Bossou, Guinea who ended up carrying her infant’s body for a total of 27 days. The mother, Jire, regularly groomed and slept next to her infant’s body and showed distress whenever they became separated. In 2000 a chimpanzee mother in the Mahale Mountains of Tanzania carried her infants body for nearly four months and individuals throughout the community were heard making distinctive vocalizations that the researchers had come to associate with fear and agitation. Other cases have been observed in the mountain gorillas of Rwanda, baboons of Ethiopia, macaques in Japan, and ring-tailed lemurs of Madagascar (see the timeline below).
Pay off my two credit cards: During my extended maternity leave (9 months), we plowed through our savings and I ended up using two of my credit cards. To me, it was worth it to acquire some debt so that I could stay home for a couple more months with my daughter. The total owed is not really that much, and if I put all my extra cash towards them, I should have them paid off by March. The only catch is, if I do that, I'm not saving up for my summer off of work (yay for teacher summers!) and I might have to go back to the credit cards and have to repay them off.
On another note I need a new header I messed mine up lol any tips on where I can do that at???
Americans seem always in motion, trying to fill each minute of each day with something, anything – to avoid the longing and emptiness Gerald May speaks of. I realize that, with all good intentions, we Westerners try and quell our existential emptiness with things; with food; with substances. We even try and cure disease by adding more: vitamins, minerals, supplements of all kinds – when what would be kinder to the body – what might well eliminate many of our ills and diseases – is likely less of everything we are conditioned to want most. The plus is, we can have more of the stuff that really matters. Less food, more exercise. Less television and computer time, more reading and human interaction. Less talking, more listening. Less action, more reflection. Less taking and more giving. Less craving, more quality of life. And in that, dear readers, you are invited to discover a wellspring of wisdom.
But to only rest deeply so that it may live again.
Thanks for stopping by and good luck to my Circle friends! Prize is $150 on cricut.com!
New home sales figures stood at 43,118. This is slightly higher than the figures for the previous quarter, which showed a record low, partly due to the reduction in VAT for new home purchases from 8% to 4% which was introduced in August
Thank Shark, I mean.
Part of the seduction is the promise of secret knowledge and powers… wealth and influence… fleeting fame and glory often… all that with a lifestyle that is glamour and lavish decadence beyond normal human experience… sexuality taken to new heights… Mysteries…
Advocacy section launch event
To some people, this probably isn't a huge task. You may have that one To Kill A Mockingbird that you had to read for English shoved under magazines and games on your desk. But for me, this was a huge challenge. The last time I counted I had over 450 books, and unfortunately for me, besides furniture, books are the hardest things to move. They are so heavy, so you need about 1,000 little boxes to put them all in.
We cant wait to hear what you have and what you are going to do with it!!
To celebrate we are going to see one of his favorite stand-up comedians, Alex Agnew, on Friday and on Saturday we have planned a family dinner. It'll be a weekend full of fun, cheek squeezes and too wet kisses!
When I made this statement to my children, we were walking to the one place that I was going to miss during our sojourn to the City of Kings.
Oh me Oh my
I am going to sit tonight and pop on the finishing touches.
I have been very remiss in acknowledging the wonderful awards I’ve received during the course of the A-Z Challenge. So, I’m here tonight to make up for it.
Model US110c offers support for Windows CE, features fast start-up powered by a lightweight thin, slim footprint frame which also enhances other demanding applications. In order to highlight new school spirit items or book delivery services. If you are used to. This very simple analogy explains the nec multisync lcd 1525m driver of this piece of writing.
Honestly, I made (and spilled) these things a week or two ago, but I saved these pictures for a time like this...when I'm ultra exciting and and not use my brain.
We made love until we passed out in each others arms. When we awoke, the sun was shining brightly. We kissed and snuggled, then made love once more – slowly and sweetly. Finally, sated for the moment, you asked me if I'd play for you. Nothing could have made me happier, and I strummed parts of my songs as you watched me and hummed along.
Wings of Desire
Cut a Birdhouse Box out of cardstock using the eclips machine and Albums, Bags & Boxes #2 Cartridge. Embellish with ink and fold along the score lines to assemble. Cut two decorative accent embellishments from the Loopy Tag Bag out of dark brown cardstock using the eclips machine and Albums, Bags & Boxes #2 Cartridge. Trim away excess and adhere above and below the opening on the Birdhouse. Cut 3-D Flower embellishments from the Birdhouse Box out of cardstock using the eclips machine and Albums, Bags & Boxes #2 Cartridge. Assemble flowers by rolling around a dowel starting from the outer part of the flower and rolling tightly around the dowel towards the center which becomes the outer part of the flower and tucks under to become the base. See the step-by-step instructions for the 3-D Flower here. Attach the assembled flowers to the Birdhouse roof as embellishments. Cut vines and branches of your choice from cardstock and attach to the Birdhouse roof as embellishments. Cut the leaf embellishments from the Pie Slice Box out of cardstock using the eclips machine and Albums, Bags & Boxes #2 Cartridge and adhere to the Birdhouse roof as embellishments. Embellish with inked ribbon bows, moss and small flowers.
I’ll keep you posted!
Anyway, there I was – waiting for the train to come and because the DC Metro is not operated on common sense, I was waiting for a good 20 minutes at 1:30 in the morning. With all that time to spare and my phone practically dead, I did what any writer who carries around a journal with her would do – I began to write. (It also stopped any temptations to write drunk texts to anyone, so pretty much a win win eat eat situation).
Back in the times of nickels and dimes and love.
B is for BATMAN!!
1 tbsp ground cinnamon
"The Star-Spangled Banner" was first recognized by the Navy in 1889. In 1916 President Woodrow Wilson ordered that it become the national anthem, but his decree didn't take hold like he wanted. It wasn't until President Herbert Hoover signed a Congressional resolution in March of 1931 that it was galvanized as the National Anthem that we know today.
As for my quarry mates:
"According to the information we’ve now received, there’s been a sudden, steep drop in the birth rates in countries on every continent. So far, we’ve got official confirmation from over 40 countries."
Mitchell AD, Wurzberger SM. Boxed in? Australia’s plain tobacco packaging initiative and international investment law. Arbitration International 2011;Vol27.
He has dreams of playing college soccer and going to medical school. At 15-years-old, he already has many goals and dreams in place. With his busy schedule you wonder how he even has time to volunteer.
The title is an invitation, so is the book cover and what more to catch my interest – the blurb said it’s about two friends, their journey from the cradle (not to the grave yet)… but well into their adult years… the story of Raheen (Ra) and Kareem (Cream) and their families: the relationships between fathers and sons, fathers and daughters, between best friends, a group of friends, not-so friends and acquaintance.
Is there a blinkie for this challenge?
Going to stop now.
‘Yes this is a common problem. You ordered an unhappy meal, sir?’
Yet, the very same people, the Brits, when they call you from the cable company, they’re not calling to charge you a moving fee or to tell you that your bill has gone up. They’re calling because they’ve figured out a way to SAVE you money. We actually had a cable representative call us up to LOWER our bill. Wifesy and I nearly had a stroke, as nothing of the kind would ever happen in America. That’s the upside. The downside – besides getting everything yourself in a pub – is the golden rule. In Britain, if there is a rule, it is sacrosanct. Everyone follows it until the queen calls the whole feckin’ thing off. They are sticklers about their rules. You can ask for a supervisor. It won’t feckin’ matter. So, don’t get your top hat in a tizzy.
Florets from 1 head cauliflower
Or the effect might have been for us to be annoyed at the false analogy, and to see the film's manipulations as exploitative, sensationalistic, and ridiculous.
* Early Girl, Cherry and Big Boy fight it out in the tomato patch...
She goes
It started off with the opening night thanks and introductions, with the highlight being the special thanks to Executive Director Peter Stein, who is stepping down after this festival to pursue other projects. On a personal note, I'm a big fan of Stein's, and was honored to join in the standing ovation he received. This is his 8th year in charge, which is most of my tenure as an audience member. So for me SFJFF has practically always been a Peter Stein affair, and whether we've celebrated crowd-pleasers or gutted our way through controversial screenings, he has always been professional, intelligent, and the sweetest guy in the world. Here's to you, Peter, and best of luck in your endeavors.
Love is a perfect vision.
16. Whish You Were Here (04:59)
Have a wonderful day and God bless!
*2 pinches of sea salt
She hasn't washed it again and I really can't wait until she washes it and I can see how the coconut oil works with her curls...... hopefully they won't be as frizzy and wild. We'll see.
So how do we practice this art of noticing? The spiritual disciplines of silence and solitude provide a great place to start.
Flash’d as they turn’d in air
I have spent about 30 minutes or so blindfolded. I could not see light, or what is normally seen in the light.
I don’t know much about juicing. I have never done a juice cleanse before. In all my research, I don’t see how it can be a completely bad thing to fast for a few days drinking absolutely nothing but fresh, natural juices mainly from vegetables. I visited the Blue Star website (a local juice bar) to see if they had any suggestions or juicing programs. From what I can tell, they don’t. Buying a sufficient juicer would cost around $300 + the cost of pounds upon pounds of fresh fruit to push through it. It seems that purchasing juice at the local juice bar is just as expensive and at least allows me to be noncommittal to the idea of doing this ever again.
What did the carving knife say to the pumpkin?
MONDAY'S CHILD
Fortunately, when it was time for the orchestra and band awards,
This is not what I had in mind when I bought into the "The World is Our Classroom !!" deal.
Been painting a lot, just the uploads are slow for many many reasons. Here’s the second Khador ‘jack I’ve painted, a classic Destroyer. He has got a BIG gun.
I got to know Julia and John quite well over the summer and was amazed at how little I knew about video games. Luckily John clued me in about many of them and what weapons were able to kill each dragon and I even learned a little bit about how to painfully torture some army men also. Julia taught me many new things also, she is just a gorgeous little lady who I can already tell is going to one day be representing Nebraska at the National Pageant and I'll be there cheering her on every step of the way! I can tell that going to these events has really helped these two become more outgoing and less shy. It surprised me from the day we were crowned to the day we gave our titles away just how much more outgoing they were and were willing to talk to strangers they met on their journey this past year.
You want proof? Wait to see where Petrino coaches next season.
Surgery is a short term fix and will not result in long term success without a lot of effort. I will admit that looking great takes a lot of effort in today’s society. Portion sizes are enormous, we work too much, and it can be hard to fit in exercise. Unless you get a spot on the Biggest Loser or go away to a weight loss camp, you will have to make constant efforts to lose weight. It’s worth it because the healthier you feel, the better your life will be. YOU ARE WORTH IT!
Midwives who have moved into private practise may not value this aspect of the hospital program to the same degree as those who take the hospital caseload-homebirth positions.
This colour as of a fantastic narrative ought to cling to the family and to our relations with it throughout life. Romance is the deepest thing in life; romance is deeper even than reality. For even if reality could be proved to be misleading, it still could not be proved to be unimportant or unimpressive. Even if the facts are false, they are still very strange. And this strangeness of life, this unexpected and even perverse element of things as they fall out, remains incurably interesting. The circumstances we can regulate may become tame or pessimistic; but the “circumstances over which we have no control” remain god-like to those who, like Mr. Micawber, can call on them and renew their strength. People wonder why the novel is the most popular form of literature; people wonder why it is read more than books of science or books of metaphysics. The reason is very simple; it is merely that the novel is more true than they are. Life may sometimes legitimately appear as a book of science. Life may sometimes appear, and with a much greater legitimacy, as a book of metaphysics. But life is always a novel. Our existence may cease to be a song; it may cease even to be a beautiful lament. Our existence may not be an intelligible justice, or even a recognizable wrong. But our existence is still a story. In the fiery alphabet of every sunset is written, “to be continued in our next.”
Recommended for those who like strong female characters and exploring the worlds surrounding alternative careers intrinsic to Japanese nightlife.
Lead tanned and weathered faces
Wohlstetter’s activism on behalf of American imperialism and militarism lasted well into the 1990s. According to Abella, the rise to prominence of Ahmed Chalabi — the Iraqi exile and endless source of false intelligence to the Pentagon — “in Washington circles came about at the instigation of Albert Wohlstetter, who met Chalabi in Paul Wolfowitz’s office.” (In the incestuous world of the neocons, Wolfowitz had been Wohlstetter’s student at the University of Chicago.) In short, it is not accidental that the American Enterprise Institute, the current chief institutional manifestation of neoconservative thought in Washington, named its auditorium the “Wohlstetter Conference Center.” Albert Wohlstetter’s legacy is, to say the least, ambiguous.
We drove some more.
The Book Buff: When did you begin writing?
His father, Joseph, was given his freedom in Jefferson's will. Peter's mother and six of his brothers and sisters, on the other hand, were sold. Despite Jefferson's stated desire during his lifetime that families remain together, this family -- and many others -- were broken up during this mass sale. It took twenty three years for Peter to be reunited with his family.
Mark B.
Detroit is becoming known as The Feral City due to generations of soul-rotted "leaders" that bled her dry and left her corpse to rot, her people to scrabble for their bread.
Make out like it never happened and that we were nothing
When you lead with love, your organization can become much more successful than it can be otherwise, because people who are treated well will be motivated to give their best efforts to their work.
The Paper Mate InkJoy portfolio includes seven pen styles available in a variety of bright, modern ink colors.
What that means:
1/3 cup cream
noted that they were soft. The mother then asked the daughter to take an egg
In my opinion, Abella here confuses numerical with empirical. Most RAND analyses were formal, deductive, and mathematical but rarely based on concrete research into actually functioning societies. RAND never devoted itself to the ethnographic and linguistic knowledge necessary to do truly empirical research on societies that its administrators and researchers, in any case, thought they already understood.
Soto was always a favorite of mine after that game.
3. Fade to Dust
tricking
It is easy to become discouraged when you have written just a few articles, and your revenue is not consistent with the time you put into article writing and submission.
By its decision, Arizona denies that U.S. history is big enough to include the history of its Latino citizens and of their legacy, which includes (but is not limited to) an academic, intellectual tradition that predates any other in North America. (The first university in Mexico opened a full 100 years before Harvard, the first university in the U.S., and 127 years before the first university in Canada.)
MOTOR
and lots of it...
3 celery stalk (roughly chopped)
I stayed up pacing. What am I supposed so do? I threw out the last piece of me. I know it probably sounds so minuscule, but to me? I feel like everything is over at this point. Food runs my life. Not me, not my mother, not anyone else. Food. That’s all. I hate it and it isn’t fair. But I let it go on this long. I saw this coming. Now I’m rather fucked.
Then — in my childhood — in the dawn
I expect Kay Jewelers will offer selling diamond-encrusted light sabers for Valentine's day next year, and they will glow neon pink when you turn them on. There is no doubt a market out there for them.
Which is infinity, or ∞mpg.
I bow my head to her.
Trifle not at thirty-five;
There’s a day that’s drawing near
("Relaunch? I didn't know it had been unlaunched!")
Reassured, Wind roiled and enveloped the Crone,
I have been thinking since then about another self-help book I have started. (Don’t ask me if I finished the other two, I haven’t.) The question this most recent book is asking me is:
27Then he saw wisdom and evaluated it. He set it in place and examined it thoroughly. 28And this is what he says to all humanity: The fear of the Lord is true wisdom; to forsake evil is real understanding. Job 28:27, 28
Benwell, Scotswood and Elswick were the sites of a number of coalmines. The Montague Colliery Disaster occurred on 30 March 1925 and was caused by an inrush of water from the nearby Paradise Pit resulting in the loss of 38 lives. A memorial to the victims stands in Elswick / St. John's Cemetery. My next task is to update that page with recent photos of the memorial in the next few days. Job done.
The last paragraph of A.A.’s own biographical sketch on Dr. Bob said:
Wait until each side turns a deep gold color, they should be soft and fluffy. Plate them and butter them. Mikey likes powder sugar but that's optional.
I so get you.
- New options for treatment are not good news, BUT +, I am asked to present at Pecha Kucha night with 9 other Austin creatives.
"You mean... carrot. In a cake? With sugar?" Cue strange looks and eyebrow raises. Just try adding that the frosting is made with cream cheese, and now you really sound weird.
Distress Ink - Antique Linen, Spiced Marmalade, Vintage Photo
I woke up the next morning with a sizable bite on my thigh. Of course, Nellu didn’t reapply any DEET but I got bitten. And the culprit, she had passed out on the mosquito net. She was so drunk off my blood that she didn’t even flinch Nellu came in to smash her – leaving a blood stain on the net.
don't hold back...
He then advised that Mr van Zyl must remove all his belongings from the car. He then ordered him to sit in his car whilst he spoke to a fellow colleague standing close by. He then joined him in the car and began a concerted effort to scare and intimidate him by advising that him that in jai lhe would most probably be assaulted and raped. He then asked him what he (Mr Van Zyl )can do for him "to make all of this go away".
Humans aren’t the only ones with angry moms. Over the last few weeks, we’ve begun to feel as if we were in the Hitchcock movie “The Birds.” Nearly every window in the house has been under assault from an angry female cardinal bent on defending her territory. The windows are covered with wing marks and the sills are covered with another bird byproduct.
Or is she known in all the land,
When the sun was in Leo, the worts (from the Anglo-Saxon wyrt plant) were gathered to be dried and stored. Some tribes also called it the Hay Moon. Perhaps most commonly known as the Buck Moon, because deer start growing velvety hair-covered antlers in July.
Both in drawing battle lines and in separating the epistemological from the non-epistemological, it becomes difficult to separate the partitions from the clouds of swarming objects.
Imagine my surprise as I got closer to discover that it was actually completely made from old antique treadle bases!
A week like this has brought back the fire within and made me realize the reason I love to do triathlons. I love TriRudy Camp!
And for…what is this anyway?
War raged with all our guts on the ground,
There is something decadent and senile about a society obsessed with titties.
Without further ado, I now place you in the capable hands of B, and her post about the glitz and glamour of American political scandal!
Because my stupid ass got him too used to being rocked and cuddled to sleep and presently he is refusing point blank period to fall asleep any other way and I don’t like it… so I’m letting his spoiled behind cry it out. Trying to anyway, he is pulling my heart strings I can’t lie!
I need a horse. -Thor, to pet shop manager
-run the ROOMBA in the living room
Also, there are a couple of tidbits of good news. First, SMALL PERSONS WITH WINGS has been accepted for Scholastic Book Clubs and Book Fairs, starting this coming winter. THE UNNAMEABLES, meanwhile, is on the reading list for the Youngstown State University English Festival, which brings some 3,000 teens to campus every march to discuss the books on the list, among other activities.
However, this version didn’t fly with a test audience in the US, so they took the Michael Bay approach. Smart move(!)
This is the essentials list according to Vogue Paris....I would be tempted to add a few extras but then I guess that's not the point....if we start here then maybe we are on our way to a little of that elusive bien dans sa peau...keeping it simple, keeping it classic...keeping it French....xv
I am reminded that whenever we seek to be creative, there are going to be a few (likely many) misses before we hit on what we were planning to create all along. Notice: “buff Greg” wearing an adult diaper and… “Penguin Greg”.
We Americans, of course, hate this idea. We like to believe that everyone is born equal. Who cares if your great-great-grandfather was Lord Pemberton Vestige Himmelhead Pippycock? That was, like, two hundred years ago. What have you done for us lately?
The envy I envisioned on my female classmates' faces was always priceless.
I look at the chalk drawing.
2nd, I want to live at Annie's house. I would be her maid and she could pay me in food. I love that she makes things that are reasonable and not too far fetched where I can't find the ingredients in my local store.
so here is my list:
The Anansi stories are among my favorite trickster tales, so here are a number of retellings starring the funny, lazy, and clever West African spider.
"Theatre Of The Nameless is a heady mixture of opulent hues, decadent pigments and fearless application. A bruised and burnished pallet that gives a sensual slip that bleeds colour in colour, worn through and kissed off" Alex Box, Illamasqua Creative Director
Another, perhaps more morally hazardous example: prostate cancer can be treated with radiation or surgery, or, in the case of a slow-growing tumor, even ignored. Specialized radiation units are being marketed, and sold, to the very urological surgeons who usually make the decision regarding treatment. The DaVinci surgical robot has become a marketing tool for both urologists and hospitals eager to increase their market share of prostate treatment without clear benefit over skilled surgery (or sometimes radiation or observation). Tidy profits are made, the units are sometimes leased and always depreciated on taxes by their owners. If you own a hammer, you look for a nail, especially if the nail is worth thousands of dollars to you. Not a part of the free enterprise, profit driven health care system that appeals to a patient interested in an unbiased decision with his needs unambiguously at the core of it.
Before society inures us to bustle – in a time preceding the noise of family squabbles, electronics and the overall din of civilization – beats a heart yearning for serenity. The head conditions itself to busyness while the soul basks in silence. The further I have returned to that innate longing, the stronger my penchant for solace in open oceans and in quiet forest glades.
This week Wendy decided to shake it up a little bit and gave us a sketch.
After an intensive but fruitful week with three Pulitzer Prize worthy books, below summarizes my verdict. (Click here for my previous post about this reading challenge)
I did want to show you why I missed tea yesterday.
IN PLACES WORN AND PATCHY.
Since 1999, the city has dramatically reduced the number of sewer spills and rain-induced overflows.
Now I’m not sure what kind of cooks they’d had before I moved in because it took them a while to trust me in the kitchen. Eventually I won them over, but it was a long process that began with what I refer to as the Brownie Mix Incident.
Every now and then, at the end of my acting class in college, someone would stand up and proclaim "Today was my failure day," to which the class would respond with a rousing round of applause.
So basically, make sure you chose something you want to do because the more you love it the more they’ll love you. Research until you know the company inside out. Understand the application process and prepare, so you have the best shot of getting that internship. Ask the CEC for help – we’re free and amazing at careers stuff. Good luck!
“Cloud computing will reshape the Indian IT market by generating new opportunities for vendors and driving changes in traditional IT offerings,” said Pari Natrajan, chief executive of management consultant company Zinnov, according to IANS.
can not be polite with the component Kurd who is with us more than we have him, and they take their decision to return or not the light of the current position.
In sharing these feelings with my family I have already started to feel better. They have offered some tremendous suggestions. As a result of their help, I'm resting more, doing things I love (i.e. yoga), eating delicious "mood foods", and making an effort to get out of the house every day. I must say, as I write this I am struggling with an all-out chest cold. I should be glum, I physically feel like crap, but emotionally I feel good. This is a feeling I haven't had for a long time and I have been tear-free since Friday.
L.A. Noire is not the masterpiece that I had hoped when first seeing its dazzling prerelease trailer. It may, however, be the closest thing yet to a time machine. I spent hours just sightseeing in its wonderfully accurate recreation of post-war Los Angeles. The city might be little more than an elaborate set and, perhaps, a lot of unnecessary work for a rather narrow purpose, but it remains an extraordinary achievement. I admire L.A. Noire for what it is trying to be even when it falls short of those ambitions. This is a big-budget videogame where gunfights and car chases are only the side-dish. Deliberate and considered crime-scene investigations and interrogations are where the game plies its trade and that, at least, makes for an interesting change of pace. It would, however, be wrong to recommend L.A. Noire for what it is striving for rather than what it is, and it is, usually, merely competent.
Dunlaw has sought counseling for his grief but says psychiatrists have not helped so far.
Condiments:
We certainly have the talent in Britain. Just look at the fashion industry: in the last few years we’ve home-grown global stars like Christopher Kane, Erdem, Peter Pilotto, Mary Katrantzou, Jonathan Saunders. What’s happening now is that they are all going online because there’s almost zero expense and no risk. But if there were more opportunities for them to showcase their skills, it would make the high street more exciting for all of us.
Time Dominating: Seeking to grab the biggest chunk of the time allotted to discussion so the other side cannot provide their message and rationale.
the inner qualities of heart and mind.
But what can we reasonably expect when we have a sitting Supreme Court Justice, Antonin Scalia, who says things like, “Innocence is no bar to upholding a criminal conviction.” And here I always thought innocence was a pretty important part our criminal justice system.
Should have blog earlier but was really sick. Having bad cough, fever and itchy skin since the last 2 days of Taipei trip till now.
Patients suffering from irritable bowel syndrome and other gastrointestinal disorders are all too often treated with steroids or anti-inflammatory to alleviate the symptoms. It is well known that diet and nutrition play an important part in the treatment of gastro-intestinal disorders but it is not commonly appreciated that hypnotherapy and psychotherapies offer extremely effective therapeutic options that should not be overlooked when considering the appropriate remedial treatment.
Saturday morning, I wanted to make a kind of special breakfast for myself since I was excited to celebrate the Les Miserables day arriving! So, I made Eggs Benedict! It’s one of my favorite breakfast dishes and not too difficult to make.
Speaking of, let’s get back into the episode proper.
means to visually display a moving image of a pitcher; and
Have you ever been in a situation when two men competed for your attention at the same time? Who won, and why?
I got partnered with Meghan from The Struggling Cyster. What a sweetheart! She is in school and super busy and I might be a little busy with a certain bitty. Because of this, we are about three weeks late on posting. Good thing I'm not alone in this!
Hugo befriends station shopkeeper Georges Méliès (Ben Kingsley, Schindler’s List, Shutter Island) and his adventure-seeking goddaughter Isabelle (Chloë Grace Moretz, Diary of a Wimpy Kid). Hugo discovers that they have a transformational connection to his father and the automaton—unlocking a past the old man has buried inside himself.
I have been hearing a lot about gratitude lately. It seems like a good idea to take a few minutes and think of the things that you have to be thankful for. It’s funny in some ways, because many individuals when asked, will start out with material things on their lists of things to be grateful for. That is a bit difficult for me to understand, but then, I always go against the grain in most situations. I have so many things that I am grateful for. What about you? One of the biggest things that I am grateful for is my ability to help others whenever possible. It’s just something that is very important to me. I know without doubt, that God puts people in my life for a reason. Personally, I feel very blessed to be able to help someone else, whatever their need may be. God always finds a way for me to serve Him.
Happy Birthday Sissy & Bubby!
Reform Watch Greece introduces the first of a number of surveys we plan to conduct on structural reform in Greece. Please take a few minutes to answer the questions on the fancy new “Polldaddy” application we are trying this time. This vehicle should make it possible to analyze results at the end of the survey and even repeat some questions over time so we can build up a usable database.
In my weakness, when I rise, My God is shown to be strong. Because I know that in me alone there is nothing strong. It is Him in me that is strong. I will always tell of how his strength took away my anxious, empty, exhausted, afraid, perfectionist heart, and made it joy filled again.
Although he was released in February 1990, it was not until 29 January 1991 that those around Mr Mandela allowed him to meet me. When Amakhosi in the Eastern Cape asked why he had not yet met with me, when it was known that we were friends, he replied that the leaders of the ANC/UDF had "almost throttled" him.
-Similar music tastes
We meet every week!
Cover Chatter: Well done, design team!
We all drove down to southern California late Tuesday afternoon. Three cars, seven people. We arrived at the campground at Mt. Baldy just after midnight.
Intuitive Eggplant had a visual of some nice looking Turkish Eggplant (who knew there was such a thing) presumably for the Culinary Smackdown this Sunday (31 July). I like that she doubled up the Haiku with her (our) Smackdown. I'm all about efficiency. And she savors her victory over all of the other safari participants. And it was very close to rhyming too.
The ones who have left me treats and care packages.
Although times have changed, and I have changed in more ways than I dare to count, a good chocolate chip cookie remains the same in my mind and heart. In the minute it takes me to finish a cookie, I am a child unencumbered by the troubles of the world all over again. It has that power to bring me back to my carefree days, and it is these moments I savor the most; especially now that I’ve discovered that in growing up, you cannot afford to be happy-go-lucky as much anymore.
1 can Campbell’s Golden Cream of Mushroom Soup
* 1 cup grated parmesan cheese, divided
Flour you working surface generously. With oiled hands cut out small balls of the dough and arrange them on the floured surface. One by one, flatten the balls to form a circle about 2 to 2 1/2 inches. Let the doughnuts proof for 30 minutes. Meanwhile heat the oil to 375.Fry the doughnuts until golden brown and drain on a paper towel.
. . . In reviewing Stringfellow's career, political scientist Frank Jonas wrote, "If anyone had dared to attack Stringfellow either on his war story or his veteran status, the anger of the electorate would have turned on the accuser and not on the accused..." The congressman had evoked considerable sympathy not only in Utah but also wherever he spoke across the nation.
Since I picked up the limitless layers-circles die from Papertrey, I have been trying to incorporate them into several designs (and unfortunately, often failing!). Finally, I figured out a design that would use all the things I wanted to include- that fun scalloped circle, some layered images, and still plenty of room for a sentiment without it being a boring layout.
3. LACK'NROLL HIGHSCHOOL
stix 2 3&1 mm foam pads
Gall midges give rise to the “galls” in plants, a swelling that emerges with more rapid growth in particular locations such as the plant’s leaf or stem, due to the saliva secreted by larvae of the organism in question. The larvae then feed on the excess plant tissue that forms inside the gall.
Terry Pratchett is above anything else a writer. He has long been one of my favourite authors in the world. He makes me laugh, he makes me cry (more crying), he makes me think how damned clever he is and how I wish I could construct the kind of punes he does without looking like a complete fule. He also happens to have Alzheimer's. He's made 'coping with it' jokes about that--at the beginning wondering "what kind of vegetable would I be?". Now, as the condition progresses, he is confronting his own end--and how he would want that to occur.
And those who just devolved
Well, the wonderful "One World One Heart" event isn't over yet, but I just wanted to add a huge thanks to all of you who took the time to stop by and leave a comment on my blog! It's just been delightful reading your comments and also visiting your blogs.
Event coordinators have even invited President Obama to attend. He has an invitation, and his own board if he chooses to come.
Put the spring form pan on a baking sheet, and pour the batter into the pan, smoothing the top with a spatula. Bake until the edges are set and light golden, but the center is still a bit jiggly, about 1 hour and 15 minutes. Cool completely on a wire rack before removing from pan and serving.
And we have just put out a new album called "Existence".
I had a change and used my grand circle nesties and scalloped nesties to make this card shape, my mum loves lemons and greens so used those colours too,
As you see “Dangerous_Dave’s idea” it’s the idea of someone who posted in my request on GM forum and helped me out with the problem of trying to control the ball. This pretty much worked.
Colossians 4:2
Did it ever occur to you that the days of distant pasts
(The above excerpts taken from a speech by Bill Lind in February 2000.)
Bridgette Guerzon Mills My artistic style incorporates my photographs and paint or encaustics to create organic pieces that speak to the cycles of life, memory and the passage of time. I enjoy creating multilayered surfaces that invites both the visual and tactile senses. My work has often been described as melancholic or evoking feelings of longing and stillness.
Some in the Israeli Peace Camp or in Washington, advocates of the so-called peace process, will say this is not the way. They will be echoing those who stood on the wrong side of history. The American Freedom Riders not only defied the Jim Crow segregation laws; they also defied many “white liberals” and the White Citizens’ Councils, who said their actions were too provocative and too much, too soon.
I would suggest choosing three - one that you feel is ideal,
CONGRATULATIONS CHICK!!!!!!
“Don’t you guys have anything better to do,” he asked stalling as he scanned for a way out. The three grinned like ravenous wolves and a chorus of nos went around.
I've had a taste of this, and it's still sweet so I'm letting it sit in the keg for a while more before I put it in the kegerator. Let it finish out more.
And the question people have asked me already – how are you going to include bacon in your wedding?
Siobhan Harvey / Paula Green: Crosswinds & Sonja Yelich: Clung / 117-18
Bushes reach for my clothes, I do not heed
Many of my upper grade students have been bringing their work home lately to work more on it. They ask ME! I feel so encouraged. . . especially because they are bringing it back. One student, who I've watched go from scribbles to sophisticated drawing, asked to bring his playing card home (we are designing playing card portraits.) He was so proud to show his mom his work. He's been working on a scrap piece of paper to make designs that he will add this weekend to the card. I LOVE the little ones, they area squeezable, creative and exuberant, but the upper grades and this level of work really picks me up after talking about lines and identifying shapes and where the trash can is for 5 hours of the day. Somewhere in my next life I will be making more of my own art and teaching in a high school (photography/video preferably.) For right now, I am happy to be where I am. I always say I will stay here as long as our principal stays. I bet you've never heard that one, but a good principal is hard to find. We all can agree on that, I'm sure.
With that in mind I may not be around much this week, or I might be, who knows, just giving you the heads up.
Itasca - A huge party is planned! You can visit the website for a complete list of what will be there, but a few of the attractions include free open pool hours, a fire pole slide, a climbing wall, Gameworks, an X-ray van, a bike obstacle course, and face painting. This all takes place from 5:00 pm to 9:00 pm at the Itasca Water Park, 100 N. Catalpa in Itasca.
Perhaps the tools of the journalist are more effective for the modern age: researching issues, hitting the street with questions, collecting responses, and organizing them into an interesting narrative. But rather than the latest war, the stories could focus on the notion of war itself or the claims of justice that underpin it. A lot of creative nonfiction tries to do this, using modern events to propel readers into something deeper about the nature of existence, something that approaches a universal or eternal. Some authors say they search for “truth” in the facts. I wonder if they’ve ever read Plato.
Location: Villingili Island, Addu Atoll, Republic of Maldives
Last year, however, he miraculously managed to get a second timeslot at 7.00pm for part of his Fringe run to compensate and did two shows a day and then, when he lost the venue for the extra slot, he waited outside the venue at the appropriate time, picked up people who thought he was performing inside and dragged them off like some latter-day Pied Piper for a performance outside in another street.
"It's a miracle!" hubby said to the mechanic without receiving a reply.
UK
4) Starting from the top of the feathers, stitch them in place with vertical stitches. Use small vertical stitches along the very top row, then long stitches in the centre of each feather shape, and finish by sewing a final row of vertical stitches along the bottom feather piece. Remove the pins as you sew.
What I'm hoping to do is to work out a challenging, but realistic, amount that I'll set as our new food budget. I doubt it will be $85 a week but I don't want it to be too much more. I want you to all come along on this journey with me. I think it will do us all good to check what we're doing to make sure we're still on track. But I don't want to jump right into it. I want to do this mindfully and carefully, by next week I'll have a better idea of my figures but it will take me a full month to get an accurate idea of what we should stick to in the near future. This week, and during the coming month, I'll write about my progress. If you want to join in, please let me know you're here and as usual, I'll start a forum thread so we can discuss what we're doing, give hints and tips and try to find the best way of doing this for all of us.
She is so relieved to relinquish the reins and have someone else bring the situation under restraint that she gushes with thanks.
Since my last post I’ve read John Green’s An Abundance of Katherines and Paper Towns, Lauren Oliver’s Pandemonium, David Levithan’s The Lover’s Dictionary, Rick Riordan’s Percy Jackson and the Olympians, and Stephen Chbosky’s The Perks of Being a Wallflower. Of the above, five are YA novels. Of those five, two were pure fun, one was infuriatingly insipid, and two encouraged me to examine my life through different perspectives. Just because I’m twenty-three doesn’t mean I have my life any more figured out than these teenaged protagonists do.
What I can tell that is different in me since I began my search a few years ago, is that the peace of God has re-entered my days. Much more often than before, I am aware that He is sovereign, and that His ways really are best. I went through (and still do occasionally) such a sad and angry place–full of rejection. And now, when I am in that dark place–wanting some kind of relief/way to self-medicate, I can hear a still small voice calling me to His word and His truth–and knowing that there are answers and comfort there.
Stamp - Verve Jeremiah 29:11
Love you whenever we’re together
Last week I ventured back into the Dark Ages when I decided to close my Internet Savings Account with the Post Office because they were unable to give me a decent interest rate. (They offer a good rate to new customers but cannot transfer existing ones onto it for reasons that completely baffled me.)
of our wet nature’s sea gestalt,
Additional Vegan Sides: Chips $2.99, Fruit Cup $3.69
I suggested she might want to diversify her daily selection of potassium sources – different types of foods, varied colors. “Eat the rainbow,” as the saying goes, for the best health. Orange, blue, red, yellow, green, purple – the colors offer varied nutrients, all of which are beneficial to health.
In other words, focusing on educational classes primarily is, as I have said in my conferences, “straightening the picture on a wall of a house that is burning down.”
Place saucepan over medium heat and constantly whisk mixture until it starts to thicken. Allow it to come to a simmer for a couple of seconds and remove from heat. Add vanilla here if you choose to. Cool to room temperature and then place in a container in the frig. It will thicken more as it cools down.
I do. But nothing as fanciful as my grandson who saw an apple eating too many peanuts as we lay on our backs in the grass one day.
Bringing nature into your home - whether real or faux -
Hear that quiet buzz just audible enough to be detected.
Find the Joy in the Journey, stuffy-head and all!
That’s not imaginary; that’s Chelsea, 16, of Norfolk, and she’s not the only one.
Both of us are very pale!! LOL!!
is a local river
TOTAL (11 items) = 304.00
opportunities to do so.
The other day, I was hungry for manicotti, so I stopped by our local grocery store for ricotta, mozzarella, manicotti noodles, and spaghetti sauce. I came out of the store with those items as well as a bag of fun sized Reese's peanut butter eggs, a four pack of Cadbury cream eggs, and a container of Cadbury mini caramel eggs (my favorite...although I much prefer the full sized ones, my grocery store didn't have them.)
These days I get frustrated whenever I do experience intense anxiety. It is like a "thorn of the flesh" that keeps popping up. I will think I have finally surrendered my entire will to God, and then a long-term crisis will bring out the anxiety again. I feel like I failed the test. But just this morning, I found encouragement. I was reading David's psalm which he wrote when he fled from Absalom. (Psalm 3) And I thought, here is David--a man after God's own heart, the one who defeated the giant Goliath, the one who won many victories for the Israelites, the one anointed with the Holy Spirit and anointed to be King of Israel, and he was fleeing for his life. Eventually, the Lord lifted him up and gave him the victory. Then I thought of Elijah who was also used mightily by God and then fled for his life because Jezebel threatened to kill him. And God spoke to him in a still small voice. (There are other examples of failures after successes in the Bible and then the Lord comes in and saves them when they cry out.)
School Meals
I decided to bake the Gingery Pumpkin Breakfast Bundt recipe from her blog because it's fall and it's cold and wet and there are tons of pumpkins to be had!
Ok so it gets a third star just because I had more fun watching it than I had disappointment and despair. It’s shoddy and needs some serious TLC to be actually good but it is certainly ok. Just about.
"Because they are no longer human beings, as I told you. A dog is born a dog and a bird is born a bird, but to become a human being is an achievement - you have to think about it. You have been thinking about it for the past three or four years at least, even though you may never have thought about the thinking."
“That’s only eight,” I said after counting them on my fingers.
But I just wonder what the real significance of occupying the Dataran is.
You are being the best human being you can be and you know that even if you haven't always been that way, for none of us are perfect and we hurt the ones we love sometimes and ourselves in the hurting of others, that you have the ability right in this moment to stop doing hurtful things. You have stopped doing hurtful things. For right in this moment, as you are reading this, you are hurting no one. See how that works?
I don’t think the cat is a big fan of spontaneously-formed holes. He was very scared of the downstairs hole (see next paragraph), until we forced him into it. Then he went in one more time on his own to check things out on his own terms.
All of the actors in this film deserve praise. Ryan Gosling is a fantastic actor. He plays Lars with such a fragile and kind image that you really do care about him. He is a sweet person that just doesn’t enjoy the company of others (even though everyone does care about him). When he meets Bianca (the doll) he finally begins to open up. His relationship with her isn’t anything overly disturbing, he has Bianca sleep at his Brother’s house because the two of them are Christian and they want to avoid an intimate relationship. With Bianca around he becomes more comfortable around people in his community and begins to open up. Gosling gives a great performance. Lars is a complex man but with the help of Bianca and his friends he is able to slowly step out of his shell. Lars’ brother, Gus (Paul Shneider) and his wife, Karin (Emily Mortimer) are scared and confused at first. Lars appears to have gone crazy and they do not know what to do. They visit the towns doctor for advice on how to deal with the situation. She tells them to play along and that he will eventually choose to let the doll go. Schneider is great as Gus. He is constantly worried for his brother and feels responsible for what has happened. The always lovely Emily Mortimer is also fantastic as the pregnant wife who also cares about Lars and just wants to help him.
In the shade of the banks. Here, every spring
Apparently .DBX files need opening with something, but what? The link that it takes me to makes zero sense to me. I am googling and I can't tell the difference between a rip off, a virus, and a legitimate device. Nothing is clear to me. Does anyone have any idea what I should do please?
the passenger. Someone ran a stop sign
IR Imperial/Liberty Records LP-9304
Some years ago I thought a man named Sardonic Scholar into existence. He would be my alter ego, The man behind whose face, I would lurk and hopefully say what was really going on in my mind. Hopefully say these things without too much of a consequence. I was, after all, a writer for The Muslim Woman.
I have no idea what our internet connection will be like out there, so you might not hear from me for a little while. I’ll make it up to everyone with lots of pictures though!!!
park in the back. Thank goodness it was sunny that
So, the day before my weekly excuse to try out new recipes (read: D&D), the boyfriend planned a picnic with me and one of our other gamer friends. As awesome as that is, the food I had planned for the next day wasn’t exactly a snap, so around four pm, I went into Turbo Mode and whipped up a Middle Eastern spread to make my mom proud. (They’re not her recipes, but she’s the one who introduced me to them growing up, so I credit her.) This and the next two posts cover those specific recipes.
I still have time.
Rock Bottom Circle City Light 3.9%
I found the napkins in Briscoes on special for $2 each which was great- they are really good quality too. Or you could make your own or hunt for a set at an op-shop even. I drew the designs myself after looking through my christmas crafty file, christmas craft books and looking at clipart to get ideas.
cdalydar: "Hmmmm. What could this assailant look like? Hmmmm."
Ø PAN Card issued by Income Tax Department.
We also didn’t expect the four police cars and long black limos with tinted windows that filled the parking lot with their ominous presence and a disturbing but electric energy. The feeling that something important was about to happen.
Secret leaven: no, bless the nations
If you want something done, ask a busy person to do it. If you want to know if smoking should be banned in your town, turn to grade school kids for the answers. Mayors who are debating the smoking ban issue take notice. These kids have some valid reasons not to smoke.
The sad thing is that we are part of a social system in which individuality and creativity seems to suppressed as much as possible, where art and metaphysical value is looked down upon and implicitly discouraged, where we are expected to become part of a production process which benefits others and ourselves only tangentially. We are expected to work enthusiastically to produce services and products which often hardly interest us and which are foisted on a public who were originally oblivious of their "needs" beforehand, our efforts ultimately serving only to create disposable items to generate revenue and market share for those who control business.
Together, Jeanne and Lee will sparkle the heavens for all to see, as the night sky has two new stars above us all…
“Following those enquiries and after taking advice from the Crown Prosecution Service, Merseyside police officers attended an address in the Wrexham area of North Wales at 7.30am today to speak to the homeowner about the allegations.
Other: Linen Thread
75th Street Brewery - Three Dollar Thursday: $3.00 Pints ALL DAY. Select $3.00 appetizers. Live music with the Counter Culture band starts at 9:00. That’s 15 amazing, hand-crafted in Waldo, pints to choose from…full beer line-up will be announced soon.
The rest of the day progressed with the same sort of tone. Teasing little acts of disrespect.
2. toss them with cinnamon and sugar and a pinch of salt and put them in a very small baking dish, mine was 4 cup capacity for 5 apples/pears... basically, what you want to do is FILL the baking dish to the top with fruit (this too helps with avoiding the applesauce problem - greater fruit to topping ratio).
6. Book of Liars
And that seemed like enough. Except the cookies. The last Tuesdays with Dorie recipe of them all, posted appropriately over a week late. There's nothing I could say that my mother hasn't said better.
Before even taking stock of what I have I knew I needed two key items.
2010.08.22 Pakistan Dera Ismail Khan 1 0 Sunni terrorists gun down an innocent Shia father of two young children.
Great leaders understand that it is NOT outside conditions, but rather their inside decisions that determine their fate.
An excellent post, which provides a concise timeline of all the events leading up to today’s guilty verdict, can be read HERE. If anyone else has blogged on the issue then feel free to leave a link in the comments.
Is it an entity that works in itself? Or something that society needs to be part of, besides tax contributions and verbal critiques?
*Disclaimer: Research and information for this post was done online. Consuming large quantities or unripened persimmons can cause some medical issues. If you have medical questions you should consult a professional in the medical field.
What's different this time? Honestly, I think it's age and life experience. I think it is finally finding (or in our case, coming back to) a city we love and can imagine staying in for the rest of our lives. One might think this would make us more willing to dive in even faster, buy a place, stake our claim. Instead, we are taking our time, proceeding with caution, tasting many, many bowls of porridge before deciding which one is just right. I don't mean perfect, nor do I mean lavish. I think the right home has more to do with a gut feeling than designer back splashes and custom shower heads. While those things are dreamy, what makes me stop in my tracks when I see certain homes has much more to do with the way sunlight falls on the wooden floors or the care a master craftsman took a hundred years ago when he built the front stairs.
Kelly: Well, I pretty much clearly lied when I told you that you weren’t completely apeshit nuts.
I spent most of my pregnancy being fairly hermit-like, both on and off-line, because I was waiting for something to go wrong. After the struggle to conceive and carry a pregnancy, I was fairly well convinced that my body was little more than a death trap for any new life. I spent years being checked for conditions like poly cystic ovaries that can cause infertility, and being told that obesity caused them. I really internalized the idea that being fat meant I had destroyed my chances of reproducing. So when I finally did manage a pregnancy, I was absolutely convinced that my body would kill it somewhere along the way. I was so scared of this that I couldn't discuss anything about it with anyone. I felt like I was getting everyone's hopes up for no reason, since clearly there was no way that a fatty like me would be able to carry a pregnancy to term or give birth to a live child.
I want Happy.
Tell me these women aren't gorgeous. They are all a bit larger than they are "supposed to" be, and yet they all radiate such amazing beauty that you can't help but be a little bit inspired by them. I can't even imagine them looking any differently to the way they look now. So why am I so resistant to the idea?
A Day of pampering and fun - nails, makeup, fashion show, food, vendors and more
Ok, you know I couldn't do that. I did give her a real stern talking-to and pointed my finger at her a lot though. She knew she was in trouble. Granted, she didn't care because she'd just chased a rabbit halfway down the block. However, I think I saw her nod when I told her to let me know the next time she wants to go rabbit hunting.
I've also been on the road. A lot. You'd think I'd have blogged about this, but no. The whole point of traveling, these days, has largely been to avoid writing. But among the top ironies and headline-worthy events: I recently went to Luxembourg, where I visited an exhibition on poverty. Yes, you read that correctly. It seems the tiny nation is so full of, well, luxe, that it felt compelled to put poverty -- past and present -- on display in its city museum.
When your gut tells you the book is fundamentally flawed, let go of it. You will be able to write another book. And it will be better than the last.
The good news is that Philip Dodge and his blog, The Domesticated Bohemian, is this week's Blog of Note. Raised in Yorkshire, Philip now lives near London, a city which surprised him when he saw that "it has streetlights and everything!"
Hello to my Blog Land friends! Hope everyone has enjoyed their weekend. Mine is just starting, a glorious 3 whole days off, hunkering down with the family and enjoying quality time at home :) Absolutely, positively, nothing better :)
He promised us that we could get a dog. (Which, three months later, hasn't actually happened, but I'm totally on the lookout.) Because Chippy was almost like having a dog anyway. Whenever we ate outside, he sat under the table and begged for food. He would creep up to us when we sat out on the deck and sniff our toes. He'd even sneak into the house sometimes if we weren't careful. He wasn't a shy chipmunk, that's for sure! The last time I saw Chippy was only a few minutes before I went into the bedroom to take a nap that day. I glanced out of the kitchen window and saw him sitting on top of the grill. He wasn't doing any chipmunky sort of eating or keeping busy like they tend to do. He was just sitting there like he owned the world.
The blog has become a little different than I imagined - or perhaps it is best to say it is constantly evolving - but I enjoy writing it and I enjoy the interactions it facilitates. Therefore I am always happy to reach broader audiences even if doing so does not benefit me in any material way. Obviously there is no such thing as complete objectivity and I have my opinions, but I try and do my best to be as apolitical as possible and where I am opining (as opposed to presenting received economic research) I try and make it clear.
Fresh white corn
Each comment = 1 entry. The more entries(comments) you do, the better chance you have of winning. If you have any questions about how to enter, please contact me at LaurenTurner949(at)gmail(dot)com.
But here's the revelation of the scene: While we hear Simon's song performed in its entirety, the B-52’s only get a minute or so in the film. The camera focuses on no instrument players, we see brief medium shots of only the singers, Fred Schneider in his eye-catching and "feminine" bright yellow pants and purple T-shirt (Simon has on good old-fashioned "masculine" American blue jeans), and the two women in beehive do’s. But there’s something, thanks to the unique powers of cinema, that all of Simon’s intentionality as writer and performer can’t erase: the irrepressible, explosive, punkish energy of the B-52’s in performance, evident instantaneously from the visible, documentary evidence captured automatically by the camera.
Seasoned salt will please absolutely everyone. This seasoned salt with rosemary is simple to make and uses only two ingredients – sea salt and rosemary. If you can find French grey sea salt, by all means use it. Grey sea salt has been hand harvested from the clay bottoms of the French Atlantic sea marshes each summer since the seventh century. How’s that for being around for a while?
She is beautiful, so beautiful.
A dog whose motivation is deeper– so deep that it’s a part of the process of their life– is a dog who is called. A called dog comes to its master and enjoys the run, while a driven dog runs to its master out of fear of reprisal, for fear of doing the wrong thing. A driven dog can easily go mad trying to live up to expectations of perfection and productivity.
Jarius
How is performance measured? Your company’s league table position is determined by performance in three metrics:
My special place is no place special, it is just somewhere I feel safe, warm, and able to be myself! Do you have a special place? What things do you do there?
The other day I went to a pre-screening of a movie and at the entrance theres a little table where you can get some of the movie posters of the moves playing and some old. I took a couple I like and I star thinking in make a post about 10 great movie poster, so here we go.
*Elizabeth Norris briefly taught high school English and history before trading the southern California beaches and sunshine for Manhattan’s recent snowpocalyptic winter. She harbors dangerous addictions to guacamole, red velvet cupcakes, sushi, and Argo Tea, fortunately not all together. Her first novel, UNRAVELING (Balzer+Bray, April 2012), is the story of one girl’s fight to save her family, her world, and the one boy she never saw coming.
Mexican Soup
Here's the link for my new blog:
When I woke up this morning I felt pretty good about what I had accomplished. I had fought and won a battle that my former self would have easily succumbed to. For the "old me" it would have been 2 PBJs, a bowl of cereal and maybe some ice cream. For "new me" it was watching baseball, talking with my wife, texting with my sister and no food. I still had 100 calories left and could have had a piece of fruit but wanted to put food out of my mind last night. I didn't want to run to it any more. Remember.. I broke up with food last week.
In Štítného street there is a fine little pub specializing in beers from the Zlatopramen brewery. Unfortunately, U Tomáše Štítného was out of Zlatopramen the December day I was there, but that was no problem. The pub also had draught beers from the Březňák and Krušovice breweries.
Now someone Christian Dior me! Lauren Bacall me! Machiavell-me!
#3: I came across the same recipe in another book. It called for 1 1/2 tsp vanilla essence in the honey/butter/sugar mixture. I wonder if it enhances the taste.Will probably try it next time.
Sacrifices that our Savior, Jesus Christ, paid for each of us,
I would watch her, after every note spoken, take her black ball-tip pen and cross out the note. That cross equaled a release. The instruction given was no longer on her shoulders, it was officially passed off onto someone else.
- Pic Saint Loup*
The satirical engraving on the right depicts the quaint English custom of “wife-selling”, which wasn’t quite what it sounds like, but was more a ritual among the non-genteel classes (who couldn’t possibly obtain a full parliamentary divorce, allowing remarriage, according to the pre-1857 laws), to publicly proclaim a dissolution of marriage (though not generally recognized by the Church and State authorities). Notice how artist arranged the horns of the cattle horns behind the cuckholded husband’s head.
Do you judge uprightly, you sons of men?
Now I think why did I bother
Actually, while discussing our project in class, this method seems to have some connections to our journalism program. It’s interesting that two completely different fields could have similar approaches to teaching. As a journalism student at Mizzou, we are encouraged, and expected, to not only learn about journalistic techniques, but to apply and use them. Similarly, these Animal Science students are not simply learning about this research in class, but they are out doing it. And from experience, it seems these ways of teaching are really paying off.
Everyone made their way to their own rooms to unload their packs and belongings after the weeks of travel. It was nice to have the burden off my shoulders. As we gathered back in the main room, Jarvyk suggested we hit the market place which I readily agreed to, as well as Bransen. I was famished for real food and a real merchant to haggle with. I would have been more pleasant to go alone, alas, I think the group may suspect something so I should probably lay low for awhile to throw off any suspicion.
In many situations a light mounted on the camera is all you have. This is common in mobile operations such as news coverage. Although it is a simple, practical solution, it does not produce particularly good lighting and should only really be used when better lighting is not possible.
“If you go back just 10 or 15 years, most states had no English-language proficiency standards and offered a long menu of different types of English-proficiency assessments that were completely non-comparable,” said Robert Linquanti, a senior research associate with WestEd, a San Francisco-based education research and development organization. “The other reality is that you had districts who did not assess these kids annually or even look at how they were doing for years, and there was no real focus on the relationship between the development of English-language proficiency and their progress on academic subject matter.”
21. Why is it automatically assumed that I am a burglar when I wear pantyhose over my face?
'No'
Right now we are cruising south along the beautiful Oregon coast. The California Redwoods are next, followed by a visit with our good friend, Bill Moeller. Then a tour of the wineries of Napa, another visit with baby Benny and home. It is good to be on the road again.
As you accept the reality of loss and start to ask yourself questions, you are unknowingly beginning the healing process. You are becoming stronger, and the denial is beginning to fade.
And for the second book...
Some one had blunder’d:
Another ‘must-have’ in my opinion. This book aims to demonstrate how forensic psychology contributes to police investigations, providing practical information about the type of reports provided by psychologists and behavioural advisors. Very good on giving an understanding of the, often misunderstood, area of profiling:
Tuesday night was the wake up call. Again I waited until waaaaay late to make her lunch and while my creative juices flow late a night I'm thinking I might just save those late night creativity juices solely for paper crafts because clearly they don't work well with food crafts. Clearly. Let's see, the top box was alright with a sliced apple with some blueberries, bear fruit leathers, vitamin gummies and a rice bear with some Italian dressing to go with the rice. Hey, she's four so what ever she wanted to put on her rice was fine with me.
One of the trends I've been seeing lately is printing things out at home, instead of buying them ready made at the store. Most printers today have settings to allow for ink-saving, therefore printing at home has become much more cost-effective than it used to be. Lately, I've been finding a lot of printables on Pinterest (duh).
First, Thank You! I've received a lot of new peeps recently! Yay. Welcome all! Also, What up? to my older rockers!
Naida snatched away the canteen calmly and nodded. “I figured you were thirsty. There’s no water out here for your kind.”
-the 20-year-old girl, who lives on her own, and rock-climbs, and calls me almost everyday on her way home from working with special needs adults;
Having had his identity revealed, which was no doubt his intention, the subject turned immediately to the Jets. I admitted to Mr. Hess right away that wasn't much of a football fan, that baseball was my sport, but that didn't deter him. I think I became for him "The Fan", at least for the moment, and he went into a digression about the current situation in Jets World. The team had been particularly horrible that year and although there were still a couple of weeks left in the regular season, they were already out of contention for making the playoffs. Mr. Hess told me with some anguish that he'd just fired the coach.
He is your little boy.
this morning i have a little tyke prancing around his playroom. long sleeve gray shirt. striped socks. no drawers. he knows how to hold it as he dances an awkward jig. i am trying to allow him to make this decision on his own, but sweet carter is getting too big for the #6 diapers. it’s time. i never minded diapers when the cleanup was small and manageable. but it’s like i tell brian whenever he asks to get a big dog.
1: I like to dream! Reading reviews was an exercise in displacement: if the review was good enough, it was like you were playing the game yourself, just by extension. You got mad at the bugs, the glitches, and you were elated to find the hidden levels, and see what other secrets the game had in store for you. In a way, It was a way of living vicariously through the reviewer, until I could afford to buy new games every week, and sate my own curiosity myself (which, sadly hasn’t really ever happened).
This is just a post with a few pictures of some additions to the sun room. I told y'all I was looking for some plates to replace the fruit ones that were hanging over the sofa. You can see the old plates here.
Response Attribution
Breezing through the first of a trail of rooms, blazing with gold twirls and red velvet, and feeling a strong sense of belonging in a matter of seconds – self delusion is encouraged in these houses – I just kept going until I was brought up short in what was, by now, my dining room. I was expecting guests apparently. The table was bristling with red and pink roses, there were marble cherubs clinging to the mantelpiece, gorgeous embroidered curtains and mirrors stretching up to the ceiling, topped off with paintings of naked beauties, just in case there was any doubt about what sort of dinner party this would be. The reds and gold of the carpet glowed warm in the gloom. Turning to check all was as it should be, I noticed the plates piled up on a side table backed by another vast mirror which reflected itself a thousand times with all its plates in the mirror opposite. A great many guest were coming then. There was a rogue gold plate in the pile I noticed. Someone important was expected.
We were stupid. We were blindingly unbelievably mind-bogglingly wrong.
Cook until the other side is golden.
Here's another new thing I've never seen before. :) It's a SWIMSUIT WATER EXTRACTOR!! Stick your dripping wet swimming suit in, close the lid, and it spins it like a little centrifuge. Very cute, but very useless.
Isn't that the whole point of cooking? About creating flavour combinations that hopefully people will enjoy and if you're really lucky,will want to go away and recreate for themselves?
10. When will you visit us again?
1) In small bowl toss together graham cracker crumbs, butter, and 2 Tbsp sugar. Press crumb mixture onto bottom and up sides of a 9" springform pan. Chill in freezer while preparing filling.
+For a long time I have been searching for THE perfect yellow stoned ring. Happy to say I finally found it. I am seriously in love with it :)
So, a few months after my initial wave of rejections, I re-queried about six or seven of the agents who'd passed. I didn't tell them it was a re-query, I just sent the letter as if it were the first time.
Fourth, Fight it. Fight with all you’ve got what you’ve targeted, how you understand it and with all your focus.
Goal B: Finish without walking (except for perhaps at some water stops)
Like most things Mets these days, it’s all touch-and-go. I suppose that’s the attitude that will be taken though on Opening Day going into 2012. The payroll? David Wright’s long-term status? Ike Davis’ valley fever? Like, who is our starting centerfielder?
This miniature Limoges plate has a diameter of 1-1/2" and is in excellent condition. It is set in a small plate stand, for sitting up on a table, or hanging on a wall. The color is a deep raspberry with a gold gilt rim and gilt scene. The scene is a maiden and her suitor; he is on bended knee, she appears to be surprised.
so that he gave his own weapon to me.
Our appetizer were the bleu cheese potato chips. We had been looking at few other items but I just couldn’t resist a bleu cheese fondue and crispy, homemade potato chips. They were quick to be delivered and we immediately started crunching away. The potato chips were crisp with a heavier weight and flavorful with each bite as they were seasoned with something more than your typical salt and pepper. They were great on their own, but I really did enjoy the creamy and decadent bleu cheese fondue all over the chips. It wasn’t sharp like I imagined it to be, but still rich in flavor. Bleu cheese crumbles gave it the subtle sharpness that I was expecting. I liked the contrast of creamy and crunchy. It was also quite a large portion as we didn’t finish knowing we had a good meal ahead. But even with that being said, we also were given a basket of their breads. I had a nibble (okay, a whole slice) of their toasted cinnamon bread. It may have had some raisin components, but it was dried and delicious. Imagine taking a loaf of cinnamon bread and slicing it incredibly thin and drying it out. That’s what you got, but the flavor is so intense that it was a sweet treat for the beginning of the meal.
Can you tell us what is currently inspiring you? I love discovering new designers and little shops that I admire. Since I have only recently started my business, it's great to find other people who have undergone a similar journey.
2 tbsp cocoa
-rw-r–r– 1 root other 440 Jan 24 16:28 vfstab
Colleen and Lesley
Knowing how the series progresses, there was one very particular event I was looking forward to reading about - the balloon containing Demon Breath bursting, that causes Nash's addiction in the next book. It was great to read that moment, knowing what it would lead to. How things could have been so different if he just hadn't staggeredback and popped the balloon! But I think something would have happened anyway.
It is so hard moving on without him, without the baggage I have carried around for decades…one would think less baggage makes a journey lighter but strangely enough…it doesn’t. At least right now it doesn’t. But the happiness I am finding within myself is making it worth it…the hope I hold for him, for us… I am re-directing towards the life I have always wanted to live (and here is something money CAN buy to contribute towards my happiness…a travel fund). The happiness and re-directed hope keep me believing that my Knight in Shining Whatever is out there and will come along one day, that happily ever afters (filled with lots of happy endings) are still very viable possibilities.
The story is essentially the same as the novel: a grueling, epic tale of two men braving the wilds of Britain to recover a piece of metal.... for the sake of honor and redemption. And while the conclusion is definitely different than the book, it's just as good. In fact, the final scene brings us to back to what the film was meant to be: an epic, dare I say swashbuckling, adventure.
Ink: Wild Wasabi, Blushing Bride, Versamark
Rebutter#2: Diane Turner
Unfortunately, after years of trying to "talk" about Sam's plight and get assistance I am slowly coming to the conclusion that talk and meetings are a relatively ineffective way to get the assistance needed.
Christian marriage should show a pattern of God’s love toward the world.
What is it about a candle that can change the mood in a room instantly? I don't know .. but I know I lurrrvve them. I recently purchased a glade jar candle in the scent Angel Whispers .. it is a really pretty scent, not too overpowering. To kick off my blog I've decided to do a giveaway contest. One lucker reader will win three glade candles .. not sure of the scents yet .. it will be a surprise .. heehee.
Bang!
Transfer the ice cream into container, press a piece of parchment paper directly on top of ice cream. Cover the container with airtight lid. Freeze in coldest part of freezer at least 4 hours before serving.
J.C.'s beautiful poem, "Blighted," and his beautiful Patch of Ground and his beautiful symbolic drawing he brought to class just to show me.
Elizabethtown is fairly well-known, as far as ghost towns go, and there is even a museum on-site. However, there isn’t much left of the place. Like most ghost towns in New Mexico, Elizabethtown came into existence because of shiny rocks. In 1866, Captain John William Moore helped a wounded Indian get medical attention at Fort Union, near Las Vegas, New Mexico. Later, the Indian returned to Fort Union to trade and ran into Captain Moore whose previous kindness the Indian now repaid with a few decorative stones which Mr. Moore immediately realized bore copper. Moore asked to be taken to the source of the rocks, which turned out to be high on 12, 441 foot Mt. Baldy, just across the Moreno Valley from Wheeler Peak which, at over 13,161 feet, is the highest point in New Mexico. Even better than copper, it turned out that the mountains and valleys were rich with gold. And thus another western gold boom began. That's Mt. Baldy in the distance in the shot below.
In other news, we should have a new challenge coming pretty soon. Stick around, it’ll be a dooooooozy.
I can feel them from the inside at least, even if they still appear to be covered by a layer of fatty insulation. I’m glad my body responds well to exercise. It wakes up and says, “what are you doing?”
To celebrate the book’s upcoming release, presented below the opening chapter of Shaken. And, of course, your feedback and opinions are always more-than-welcome.
Gotta say that I really never knew just what a tooth-pulling struggle it was for the pair to finally get hitched, what with Dagwood's millionaire folk trying to break up the engagement by pulling every trick in the book extant, some of 'em downright nasty and perhaps even illegal! Dagwood himself seems quite the playboy himself, only quite mealier if you know what I mean, and easily dragged by the nose courtesy his parents who keep pushing every society femme and family friend within their grasp on him if only to further their own social standing. Extremely wealthy true, but these people are are downright crud once you scrub the not-so glamorous veneer off. At times it looks as if the relationship has already snapped apart such as in the storyline where Blondie moves back with her mother and falls for Gillespie McDonald, the rough and tumble guy next door who wants to open his own garage, but right when that affair goes kaplooey in comes Dagwood after an extended sojurn who more or less out of frustration goes on a month-long hunger-strike in order to marry the only gal he ever really loved!
If we can prove that this stuff is going on in the woods, it’s gonna put a huge, huge pressure on conservation and preserving these places. Any my guys at the Big Thicket Preserve feel the same way. There’s a million acres of land that has recently gone up for sale in the Big Thicket that’s owned by the lumber companies, and the Preserve is all concerned because they don’t know how it’s gonna be developed. The lumber companies were, to some extent, less of a threat than developers, and so they’re real concerned about trying to expand the Preserve, and so they said, “Rob, if you can bring any kind of light on this and show that this is in any way real, it’s gonna put a lotta pressure on preserving these places…
I don't know about all of you, but I love my room. Sadly, I don't get to spend as much time there as I would like, but when I do, I take a deep breath and chill out. I need to remember to do this more often. My room houses a few of my FAVORITE things.
To my mind, the two vertical walls would be the obvious only-spots to lean dressers, cabinets, etc. against. But these precious walls would also be the obvious spaces for windows and doors!
Maybe the first recitation of (the first part of) Beowulf, whenever and wherever it took place – perhaps at the court of the Wuffings in Suffolk in the seventh century. Of course my eyes would be out on stalks, and all my senses in play, but I reckon I’d be able to understand much of the language too. Or else – well, what about the stunning pagan-Christian Sutton Hoo ship burial, and all the rituals enacted at it? A crossing-place, if ever there was one.
77. Go see fireworks
Ummm, as stable as it looks, what with the ladder and two by fours, I think I'm gonna pass, but thanks honey. Very creative.
Now I really must go quilt!! Have a wonderful day……..
recorded from cable analogue TV Multishow ( I don´t know if the complete show was broadcasted in HD ) in SP mode with a Panasonic Standalone DVD Recorder with Hard Disk. there were some technical problems because of the heavy rain
Scripture shows how this is possible. John 3:6 That which is born of the flesh is flesh, and that which is born of the Spirit is spirit.7 Do not marvel that I said to you, ‘You must be born again.’8 The wind blows where it wishes, and you hear the sound of it, but cannot tell where it comes from and where it goes. So is everyone who is born of the Spirit.” NKJV
it is a rainy day in alabama. the kind of rain that makes you want to curl up in front of a fireplace with a mug of something warm and a good book. and as you read the book you become sleepy and find yourself asleep, curled in the blanket - that deep, soul satisfying sleep - the kind where many beautiful dreams occur.
When we move (just a few weeks now!) into the house I will be getting my own small room to turn into a closet. I have been slowly thinking of ways to make it the most efficient closet I can including ordering 3 rolling racks and a waterfall (for staging outfits I think of for later wear).
a quick coffee we decided on a colour scheme and the basics.
“Honey, I told you, keep still, or I’m going to knee you in the thigh again…”
Today I hope to remember to watch episode 7 of Game of Thrones since I’ve managed to forget it for the last few days. At first I didn’t like that show much, but after watching some more of it I started to be interested and now I actually find it entertaining enough to want to follow it.
WANT YOUR OWN COPY? In exchange for my review, I received a free copy of Discerning the Voice of God from Moody Publishers. I’ve underlined, starred and circled in my copy, but lucky for you, I received a bonus copy of the book in the mail. I’d love for one of you to have it! Leave a comment on the blog about why you want to know how to hear from God, and I’ll pick a winner next Wednesday, May 9 and post the winner’s name on next week’s book review post. Want extra chances to win? Of course you do! Share this giveaway with your Facebook friends or Tweet it (1 extra entry each), subscribe to this blog via e-mail (1 extra entry) or follow me on Twitter (1 extra entry), and leave ANOTHER comment her on the blog about it. Confusing? Just spread the word and come back here and tell me what you did!
Red-winged Blackbird 24
Deena, Miss Subbing for Pubbing
The interior ministry has not disclosed the number of teenage victims, but released a follow-up statement on Thursday warning extremists ‘not to step on public freedom of Iraqis.’
That minister spoke, those two people pledged and all the while thunder rumbled in the distance.
Yet I’m not wholly in sympathy with the onlookers (or onhearers, really), since I laugh at them for answering their own question. “We hear them telling in our own tongues the mighty works of God.” What does it mean? It means that these men you just accused of drunkenness are God’s vehicle for showing His power, and your own ears have heard the proof. It means that they are inspired, not merely with the breath of physical life but with the life-giving Word. It means, among all else, that the God who sundered speech at Babel can bring it back together again, as beads of mercury flow back into the whole, or as shards are forged anew in the fire to renew the blade.
Today Intellectual Ventures ("IV") enforced its rights and filed patent infringement complaints in the U.S. District Court of Delaware against companies in the software security; dynamic random access memory (DRAM) and Flash memory; and field-programmable gate array (FPGA) industries. "Over the years, Intellectual Ventures has successfully negotiated license agreements with some of the top technology companies in the world. However, some companies have chosen to ignore our requests for good faith negotiations and discussions," stated Melissa A. Finocchio, Chief Litigation Counsel, Intellectual Ventures. "Protecting our invention rights through these actions is the right choice for our investors, inventors and current licensees."Despite the creation of a "Patent Defense Fund" (to protect against patent trolls, don't-you-know) and assurances that IV is "opposed to litigation" (for more on that, see here), IV has decided to launch 3 lawsuits involving over 10 patents in the following industries:
I love love love reading stories about survival. They are some of my most favorites. There were some pretty gross things in this book, but it's the truth of it. You can kiss your inhibitions goodbye when you end up in a situation such as the one in this novel. The protag was very resourceful. She used tactics I would never have even considered. I think the author did a great job of throwing obstacles at the protag and I think she did an equally good job of solving them. Did Robie make some mistakes? Of course! It just made the book all the more realistic to me. Unless you're a survival pro then I don't really see how anyone could be in such a situation and not do things incorrectly. Trial and error.
Such gourmet greatness at such a great shipping price, you’ll want to kiss your postman when he hands it to you. Or maybe just share a goodie from the box with him. I’m in love with this catalog, not only because of the fine quality of their products but because they seem to be having a ton of fun and provide amazing customer service. I like to continually support companies like theirs, and plan on doing just that.
through the window as we slowly climbed the stair?
It was also bloody freezing. My Mum managed to get a couple of days off from work and caught the train down from monday till wednesday. OH came through weds night as on thursday Dan had an mri scan due at leeds…so on the thurday he had to drive Dan all the way to leeds and then back to brid. There was NO way that we were going home early just cos he had to have the mri. :)
The broad stream in his banks complaining.
The “new heavens and new earth” is not of this creation, and so, “not made with hands.”
Rogue Ales
For the Calvinist struggling to make sense of God’s attitudes towards the non-Christian who passes away, the pastoral response is precisely the one Taylor gives:
What am I talking about?
Lost in all the trappings of the Gilmore Girls is that Lorelai was a great mom. She’s had a best friend relationship with her daughter that can lead to complications. However, she always seemed to know when to step back and assume the role of the authority figure. Fortunately Rory rarely needed that much parenting to make good decisions, so the mother/daughter classes were somewhat rare. That just speaks to the job that Lorelai did before the events the series depicted, but frequently alluded to. All the more amazing is how well adjusted she was after being raised by a completely overbearing mother herself. I’m not sure if her total sanity is realistic, but it is nice to see such a modern and capable mother on a TV show.
"I'm in character as an airhead, so you can't possibly expect anything correct or informative from me. This article is nonsense, nothing in it matters, and if it annoys you, you have only yourself to blame for reading it."
nsnbc is a news-media, established on 28 August 2011 with the purpose to break corporate or state controlled medias embargo on truth. nsnbc publishes articles from journalists, authors and experts from all continents. nsnbc was established and is edited by Dr. Christof Lehmann with the intention to bring you daily no-spin reporting, in depth analysis and opinion from throughout the world. nsnbc is politically independent. There is no such thing as economically independent media. Delivering daily news, maintaining secure telephone lines for our whistle blowers and citizens reporters, as well as time spent, that otherwise could have been used on a paying profession are expenses that need to be covered.
(75) The obligation we feel to record events of great historical importance was not felt b first-century Christians, who were still close to the events themselves.
There is no excitement in the relationship anymore, no flame, no spark.
Infinite opportunity lies before you in the land of Agentopia, but you have to tame that beast of a manuscript to get there. With a little help from your closest ally (critique partner), you just might make it.
Bottomless
3 Get Out Of My Life
For the back of the bookmark, I stamped the lighthouse image in Vintage Sepia (VersaFine) and colored it with my Prismacolor Pencils and mineral spirits...one of my favorite things to do! Here's the back.
Anyways, that's it man. Have a good one!
I stated in my last post that I don't like to tell people that I am bipolar because I am afraid of being judged. I have given this a little more thought since I wrote this and I guess that I should explain in which ways I feel that I have been judged which may not be how you think.
For the short term, the SFG stresses the necessity of trans-border cooperation in the management of water resources in the region. More specifically, it proposed the creation of a cooperation council on water resources which should initially be limited to five countries, i.e., Iraq, Jordan, Lebanon, Syria, and Turkey. The Council, which could already be set up as early as 2011, would be entrusted with the task of developing a shared vision, together with instruments and models needed to successfully conduct a cross-border dialogue on the issue of water resources. In the medium term, the countries concerned would have to cooperate in establishing joint programmes for the management of water resources. In this way, the process of consolidating a veritable “blue peace” could begin to take shape.
1. As I told you yesterday, we are so excited for the iPad we won through Marissa's Bunny. They are doing a raffle right now through his Foundation. Basically for every $1,000 that's raised during the raffle, his company will give away 5 iPads to kids with special needs.
4. Another Rainy Saturday
Beautiful end of term open session at ballet this afternoon. A room full of little girls in lavender, alternately graceful and squirming. At seven years of age, they are starting 'intensive training' with classic routines at the barre and on the floor. It's hardly the Kirov, but so sweet to see my girl point her toes perfectly and step out on long, lean but muscular legs. She can tie a mean bun all by herself in the back of the car too.
I don't go to church enough,
Are you a bridesmaid to-be that needs help with her hair style for that special day? Call us or come visit and let’s us work on trying out different styles to find the perfect one for you! Ask us about our bride and wedding party packages for hair, nails, pedicures and make-up sessions too.
You have to be kidding me! The leader of the DCCC is condemning Sarah Palin for “crossing the line” with this supposed violent imagery when his own committee did the same thing only a month ago!?The knee-jerk “OMG, Sarah Palin scares me!” mentality of the leftocracy is so old and tired. But with regard to this latest outrage there’s only one way to describe them:
and the dream of death."
.. and who knows what’s more out there. Interestingly, all these websites are NOT containing the movies they stream. Both sites write more or less something like this “We are not responsible for what other people upload to 3rd party sites”, as they just LINK to other websites that do physically contain the movie file.
Just the other day Hadlee was playing
it's magic when you know how it works
Rice Tamale Pie: 9 servings, 7 ww pts per serving
1. Where do you write? And what does your writing space give you – i.e. why do you write there?
Mind you I’m not sure anyone was really studying my shoes at this point – they were too busy looking at my prop! You’ll see what I mean if you click on the link to the vid below.
* Which authors/stories did you enjoy reading as a child/teenager?
It's a bit like being a little kid on a swing while a big kid keeps pushing you over and over in the same place...eventually, you'll fall out and go flying off. Similarly, asteroids that wander into a Kirkwood Gap due to random interactions won't stay in that gap for long, and Jupiter will send them off on some fairly random orbit. There's good evidence to suggest that many of the asteroids which cross Earth's orbit (i.e. the ones we really need to watch out for), experienced this fate.
I like how this recipe is something different, something off the beaten trail of my usual dinner creations. I enjoy any leafy green, and I thought the arugula paired well with the bacon. Cut this flatbread into smaller pieces and it would make a great appetizer.
The Egyptian-Italian MEP, Magdi Cristiano Allam criticized yesterday an article published in the Italian daily newspaper Il Giornale, the Islamization of Europe. As "clear evidence", he cited the citizens of European countries, who convert to Islam. "Did you know that in Italy there are already 70,000 Muslim citizens?" (Cathcon- think he means the number of converts) Allam asks in his article. The total number of Muslims currently living in Italy comes to, according to the Interior Ministry, to more than 1,583,000. "Did you know that on average every four days in Italy a new Islamic place of worship is established?"
Lean muscle is the goal for me.
Acutally, I made two calendars, one with just The Millions' picks and one that uses The Millions' list as a base, but includes other books I am looking foward to. (examples: What It Is Like to Go to War by Karl Marlantes, The Night Circus by Erin Morgenstern, Ready Player One by Ernest Cline, and The Taste of Salt by Martha Southgate).
In case you'd rather read my random thoughts than checking in on my quest to live a better (My Best!) life or vice versa, this is what I'm going to do for you....
"But in recent months, the tables have turned. Policy circles in Stockholm have been dominated with talk of adopting “the Canada model.” That, in fact, is the title of a widely discussed new Swedish book titled Kanadamodellen – “The Canada Model,” which urges Sweden’s governments to start making things look more like their Nordic fellow on the other side of the Atlantic."
Browning weighed in at 162.25 pounds — a whopping 7.25 over the lightweight limit — and was noticeably chubbier than he had been on The Ultimate Fighter. He doesn’t appear to be committed to MMA.
i've been holding it in for a while, but this morning, it just came flooding out.
Last season, as General Manager of the ABA Champion Southeast Texas Mustangs, Johnny “JT” Tyson knows how to win and has the passion for the game and the experience to back it up on game day!
Nutritionists say that it’s no longer a concern, although people in a vegan lifestyle do need to pay careful attention to their supply of certain nutrients.
The boy’s mother and father joined the rally, where they called for justice.
Please be advised that you must satisfy all academic requirements and financial obligations to the university. You may review your account information via Power Campus Self Serve. Graduation fees of $45 for Master’s Degree graduates and $65 for Bachelor’s Degree graduates are payable online or in the Office of the Bursar (Wade Wilson Building, 1st floor). For questions regarding your account, you may email bursar@cheyney.edu or call 610-399-2230. All students with federal loans must complete an exit interview either online or by scheduling an appointment with the Office of Financial Aid; call Financial Aid 610- 399-2302 for further information.
B. Passing Out Of The Bread
I am embarrassed to admit it, but today was the first time I visited Cheffie’s.
Perhaps if we had a little confidence that the good is there, deep inside – especially in children – we’d be pleasantly surprised? And more likely to find it.
I hope you like the new layout and banner just as much as I do.
Jeffrey Goldberg writes in Is the Term 'Israel-Firster' Anti-Semitic?, at The Atlantic, on 19 Jan 2012:There's been a controversy raging over the past month or so that I've avoided writing about mainly because it has a Groundhog Day quality to it. It began with this very interesting Ben Smith piece, but lately it has become tiresome. Apparently, it is not tiresome to other pepole, because it just keeps going. The seemingly most urgent question to emerge from this controversy is whether or not the term "Israel-firster" is anti-Semitic. The term is used by Media Matters, the left-wing advocacy group, to describe American Jews with whom it disagrees on American Middle East policy, and it was also used by staffers of the Center for American Progress, the important liberal think tank, to describe same. CAP has disavowed the language, and apologized on behalf of the staffer who used the term; Media Matters doesn't seem to care.
SUPER BOWL XLVI (46) was an exciting game to watch, especially the final 5 minutes or so. The game was kept close through out. The game could have gone either way and both teams missed some scoring opportunities and dropped passes that would have been huge plays that would have led to a score.
Filth
Since I don't have a grill, the first thing I did was to season my skinless, boneless chicken breasts and pop them into the oven to roast at 350 for about 30 min.
Me: Yes, i'm blowing your mind on a daily basis now.
'Ahem! We live in an age of progress. 'When we look around us and see the advancement - nay, the rapid strides which art and science have made - when we notice the gradual but steady development of those resources of nature which form at once the basis and incentive of human industry, we cannot fail to be struck with the superiority of English intellect in the nineteenth century over that which has appeared in any former age. It is to the present era we owe the application of that wondrous agent, steam. The manufacture and use of gas are also of recent date. It is only of late years that we have learnt to guide the electric fluid harmlessly from our public buildings and made it subservient to our will in transmitting messages from one end of Europe to another. Photography lends its valuable assistance to pictorial art. The talents of an Armstrong are brought to bear upon the science of modern warfare. Thanks to the genial influence of chloroform, our surgeons can now with ease pursue their interesting calling, and amputations - allow me to give you a leg of this chicken? - no? - welI, as I was saying, amputations are now fearlessly and skilfully performed. Then, again, look at the Metropolitan Railway. With what ease and rapidity can the denizens of this vast and thickly-populated city traverse its enormous area! Is it not a wonderful and awe-inspiring fact that man in the nineteenth century can be thus transported from - yes, from the Edgeware Road to Farringdon Street in twelve minutes for sixpence?'
I hope and pray that all girls find the depth of friendship, community, personal growth, and connection that my daughter and I have found through Girl Scouts, and that Girl Scouting remains strong for the next 100 years!
Add the wet ingredients to the dry and stir gently with a wooden spoon or spatula. Mix until just blended. Gently fold in the raisins. Use an ice cream scoop or a spoon to pile the batter into the muffin cups (fill to the top if you want a billowing ‘crown’), or simply pour into the loaf tin. Bake the individual muffins for 18 – 20 minutes and the loaf for about 35 – 40 minutes. The top should feel firm and a skewer will come out cleanish when it’s ready. Leave the tin to cool for five minutes and then prise the loaf/muffins out using a thin knife and leave on the rack until okay to handle, but still tender and steaming. Eat very soon.
Secondly, and in any event, the document should have contained a positive obligation on the person being granted power of attorney to provide a full annual accounting of her mothers affairs to her siblings.
Tim
I could list dozens upon dozens of examples here but just one should suffice: one’d have thought that a band of the stature of (say) The Average White Band would have their entire catalogue on sale globally through the likes of I-Tunes… Fact is, that’s not the case – only in certain territories is one able to download certain albums / songs with some things available only (for example) if one is logged on via a UK ISP… meaning that, if you’re travelling (for example) or live in another ISP ‘area’ and logged on in that manner… then parts of their catalogue are unavailable.
Quick update: At the 'about me' page, Maysie declares that she,
That's all I got. Time to go hang with my Squeeze. Peace out.
today?
The race started before the sun was even up. It was really hard to dress for the race because I knew I would be so hot after running 13 miles and with the sun up. I shed a single long sleeve t-shirt, I hope the Charlottesville Good Will enjoys it - they can represent Freedom High School lacrosse. It was a huge mistake to wear a raised letter sweatshirt -- I was so hot by mile 8, but did not want to part with my first set of letters so I stuck it out to the end, but quickly ripped it off once I neared the finish line.
Well, that's it for me today. Got loads of washing to do - I can't believe how many clothes my girls wear and I bet most of it is clean - they've most likely picked it up of the floor after just looking at it, then it's got thrown in the basket.
Surveying the scene from her ceramics shop, Vasso Georgiadou heaves a sigh of resignation. ‘‘When they don’t drink, they are such good kids,’’ she says, adding that by the time the sun rises ‘‘there’ll be hundreds of them’’ wandering the resort in a drunken stupor. ‘‘But it’s not only their fault. Unfortunately, this is the tourism we Greeks have tolerated, we Greeks have gone out of our way to create.’’
Slice the sponge cake into two layers with a sharp knife or cake saw.
Advice: Accept your feelings as they come up and let them go. Go directly to your heart chakra and feel the emotion. Expand it outward to your all yourfields and breathe deeply from the belly all the way up to your upper chest. Just feel the feeling and let it evaporate on its own. Don’t direct the emotions at anyone.
Michael Oakeshott.1948.Rationalism in Politics.(Methuen)
If you are a Rajini fan, this is the most important page for you. The most waited Rajinikanth Film ‘Endhiran’s Audio is launched in Malaysia. Big Budget Shankar – Rajini Venture, first production of Sun Pictures (Till now, they are distributing films only) is going to be released soon.
If you're having issues with your machine, i.e. everytime you try to stitch, the thread goes all heywire and your machine makes grumpy noises, you may just be guiding your fabric a little too much. Back off and let your machine do the work. Keep your touch light and just keep the fabric straight; let your machine's feed dogs carry the fabric through the machine. Also, if your thread messes up, it's a good idea to rethread the top thread and take out and replace your bobbin regardless of which of the two seemed to have the issue. It may seem annoying, but it's not as annoying as having to take out wonky stitching again because your machine is still grumpy. As a side note, having automatic threader on your machine is totally worth it.
Another weakness of proxy detailing is that it shortcuts one of the things we ask literature to do, namely, to help us see the familiar in a new light. If I do indeed have a sufficient knowledge of an '85 Chrysler LeBaron to form an image of it, it is my image that is being formed, unaltered and unestranged by the author's artistic vision.
WASHINGTON-The Clinton administration’s balanced budget plan calls for $36 billion from expanded auctions over the next five years, a projection that raises key wireless policy questions.
Dr. Meshoe declared: "Because I love my country I cannot associate with dedicating it to dead people." He urged all who love South Africa to join him in prayer "to do what is right, because what the ANC is doing is wrong."
Last week I was asked what my ideal Mother's Day activity would be. My answer was a movie night with my husband and son. On Mother's Day I would love to just watch a movie in bed with my boys while enjoying popcorn and M&M's. And a diet pepsi in reasonable reach, of course. My answer became my inspiration for today's post and I'm really excited to share! I LOVE a yummy popcorn treat, especially while watching a movie. I've found a whole bunch of yummy sweet popcorn recipes that are sure to please. Any one of these would be perfect for a movie night with the boys. I can't wait to try more of these!
Ok, he said through the window,
What I do enjoy is helping people get their lives together. I think that’s the best part of being an accountant. The times I have helped my friends with their taxes, or in creating a budget to fit their needs. Maybe this sudden loss of income will be a signpost for me to reconsider the direction my life was going. Maybe I was getting too comfortable.
"But isn't there something I can do, at the least,
Paul: You need to tell him that isn't okay.
Sandals: Coliseo Sandals- ::DeeR:: -(Kawaii Fair)
Minerd accurately describes how we saved our brave little pennies, all year long: In the early 1960s it was customary for kids like me to save money year-round for the opportunity to purchase a season membership to the Crystal, a pool in South Columbus located on the corner of Champion Avenue and Markison Avenue. I remember saving change in a jar and occasionally dumping it across my bed and counting it and the euphoria I felt knowing that when the tickets went on sale I would have enough to buy one. That was probably the first lesson my parents taught me in working and saving for what was important.
After coming home and cleaning the house up a bit, Clara and Jemima, and Kylie and her two kids came over for lunch and craftiness. We had been planning to make these fabric pumpkins for a few weeks. Even though I was beginning to wonder what I was getting myself into with having people over the day before The Big Trip, it was worth the screaming children, food flying everywhere, dog running away, etc, to push things through and make the pumpkins. They turned out to be such cute little guys! Pictures are forthcoming.
Bolívar finally resigned his presidency on April 27, 1830, intending to leave the country for exile in Europe, possibly in France. He had already sent several crates (containing his belonging and his writings) ahead of him to Europe. He died before setting sail, after a painful battle with tuberculosis on December 17, 1830, in La Quinta de San Pedro Alejandrino, in Santa Marta, Colombia.
Pros: Everyone can honor the men who built this country just the way they were meant to: getting up to $5,000 off of an automobile that, at the mere sight, would have caused these forefathers to lose their minds.
Me: Have fun in school. (I’m going back to bed).
Also, old stuff that used to be stop motion animation but is now all CG. Lay-zee!
Today on the Shorpy blog, was this photo. If it seems at all interesting, click it. On the large image, you can see details of the little car to the right of the truck at the loading dock. You can see the pigeon on the roof, and the blurred ends of trees, so you can know the wind was blowing lightly when the photo was taken.
In the European elections, Spain is a single constituency and our plan is of course to submit an application. We have two years until June 2014 to work and see the possibilities we have in order to place one of our representatives in the Parliament in Strasbourg. We know that we will have a major support from European identitarian parties. That very year, in autumn 2014 provided no advancement is done, Plataforma per Catalunya will run in the Catalan elections with great chances to enter Parliament, and a few months later, in the spring of 2015, Platform will present hundreds of candidatures for the municipal elections in Catalonia and in the rest of Spain.
“Remember this: Whoever sows sparingly will also reap sparingly, and whoever sows generously will also reap generously.” – 2 Corinthians 9:6
to ram the prow
I shared a room with Lizzie Pinard, so over breakfast each day and each evening after we returned to the hotel we compared notes, sharing information and impressions from the talks we attended and the people we met. And what people! Inspirational all, friendly, motivated and everywhere! No matter which part of the building I was in, or which talk I attended, there was always a fellow PLN member to chat to, and at no point during the week, even during the pre-conference events, did I feel alone. This is a major feat for such a big event, with over 2300 delegates. It would have been easy to become lost in such an environment, and I hope that those who went without a PLN managed to find support in the crowd.
The answer – only those who wanted to discredit the outstanding display of support for Bersih! And guess who that would be!
Thank you for participating this week and I look forward to reading your submission!
9) Obama Promised to Reduce Earmarks and then Reduced Earmarks. How is that a promise broken or a flip flop? Reducing Earmarks is not the same as NO EARMARKS ever.
Yet the people of Israel were not without guidance. On the contrary, they had the Law of Moses. And from the time of Solomon onwards, the Law achieves increasing prominence in Israel’s life. Indeed, it could be argued that the more things decline following Solomon’s death, the more important the Law becomes. Thus by the time of Christ, it is the definitive feature of being an ‘Israelite’. And in the life of the early Church, working out the relationship between ‘Law’ and ‘Gospel’ as it affects Jew and Gentile becomes a key issue.
The Rabindranath Tagore Beach in Karwar is a nice place. At 7:30 it was dark, lit by only a few large flood lights. There were lots of families sitting around, kids playing in the sand, couples walking, people generally going about their own business. I wondered if I could get someone to ask me to stay at their place. But it’s always more difficult when it’s you approaching the person; it’s the same principles of animal behaviour that apply to befriending dogs, or kids. So I tried to strike up a conversation by asking some people to take a pic of me with my cycle, but it didn’t work. They took the pic and left, no one seemed to be curious enough to ask me what I was doing there with my bicycle. So then I asked people tangentially about places to stay and plainly got told the names of a few hotels. In short, I wasn’t having much luck. So I decided to spend the night on the beach; but I had to go get dinner first.
So why study economics? As economics is often defined, it is the study of how individuals and communities allocate scarce resources. The word to keep in mind is allocate, which means people make choices. Therefore, economics is a behavioral or social science.
Yule log, or small Yule log with 3 candles, evergreen boughs or wreaths, holly, mistletoe hung in doorways, gold pillar candles, baskets of clove studded fruit, a simmering pot of wassail, poinsettias, christmas cactus.
The field of Book Studies, with its theories and methods for understanding the nexus of authorship, reading, and publishing, and its ability to look for parallels in the past as well as project the future, is well situated to tackle this problem. I would like to think that scholars feel some urgency in taking this on. Let’s not just leave it to the blogosphere.
As JinC has pointed out, the record of an official police spokesperson (Cpl. David Addison) giving out false information to the public is unacceptable. Yet no record exists that Addison was disciplined in any way for his false and inflammatory statements.
“Why would I do that?” I say.
Wha-bay ...your guess is as good as mine!!
In the second scene, the Harlan County U.S.A. crew plays an even more directly catalytic role. Camera assistant Ann Lewis delivers to the ineffectual sheriff a warrant for the arrest of Collins for flourishing a deadly weapon. The warrant was obtained from a judge, presumably at least in part on the basis of evidence collected by the film crew itself. There is no shortage of footage of Basil and his fellow "gun thugs" holding to that nickname by bearing their arms in front of the camera. The production of the warrant is a victory for the striking miners and their supporters, at least for that day. And no other moment in the film better illustrates the bond between the crew and the picketers than this one.
The day of the wedding was stress-free, largely because of your team. I was completely relaxed knowing you would have the reception ready when the ceremony ended. Your team kept us on track so we didn’t miss or rush any precious moments. You were always there when we needed you: for a drink, for a safety pin, for a handkerchief – you and the team predicted our every need, were very discrete and provided such positive energy on such a long day! We wanted a fun, upbeat wedding, no tears on such a happy day, and you delivered one of the best parties I’ve ever had. What a relief it was to leave the reception knowing you would take care of the clean-up and the romantic honeymoon suite with the extra food was a touching surprise and the perfect end to the most unbelievable day.
But it’s not the ‘gore factor’ that militates against us now. The Patricia Cornwell school of pathologists analyses mutilations to the human body even Jack the Ripper didn’t imagine, and no-one says women shouldn’t write crime. Nor is it the horrors, and no-one reading Karen Maitland’s ‘The Gallows Curse’ or Michelle Lovric’s ‘The Book of Human Skin’ ever doubts the ability of women to ‘write dark’. It’s just war.
Now, aren't you sorry that you don't have one? I thought so! And I know that they have to work, because Nikola Tesla said they would! Or he said something about electromagnetic energy once! And I know he was a really really smart guy!
Even a poem
I've wrapped up a few custom jobs this week and got to try printing on wood veneer. I was skeptical at first but was happily surprised that the wood didn't warp under the pressure of the press. I was also satisfied with the clean transfer of type, but that just might be because of the quality of the magnesium die. I'm going to try using my large wood type on these and hope to see the grain of the wood through the ink! Makes me shiver just thinking about it. There isn't a whole lot of an impression in the paper, but I'm not at all disappointed in that. I just love the change from paper to wood and experiments like these. So much so that these beauties just might end up as the new s + t calling cards and product tags.
1. A recombinant microbial host cell comprising heterologous DNA molecules encoding polypeptides that catalyze substrate to product conversions for each step below: i) pyruvate to acetolactate; ii) acetolactate to 2,3-dihydroxyisovalerate; iii) 2,3-dihydroxyisovalerate to .alpha.-ketoisovalerate; and iv) .alpha.-ketoisovalerate to isobutyraldehyde; wherein said microbial host cell produces isobutanol; and wherein a) the polypeptide that catalyzes a substrate to product conversion of pyruvate to acetolactate is acetolactate synthase having the EC number 2.2.1.6; b) the polypeptide that catalyzes a substrate to product conversion of acetolactate to 2,3-dihydroxyisovalerate is acetohydroxy acid isomeroreductase having the EC number 1.1.1.86; c) the polypeptide that catalyzes a substrate to product conversion of 2,3-dihydroxyisovalerate to .alpha.-ketoisovalerate is acetohydroxy acid dehydratase having the EC number 4.2.1.9; d) the polypeptide that catalyzes a substrate to product conversion of .alpha.-ketoisovalerate to isobutyraldehyde is branched-chain .alpha.-keto acid decarboxylase having the EC number 4.1.1.72.
You know, I hate this argument but I can understand that in a macho, high-testosterone environment rape will sometimes happen. Heck, it happens in the civilian world and maybe it can never be totally eliminated. But the military can address how they respond to incidents. Some of the most distressing moments of the film is when it shows the pathetic efforts at training to prevent assaults. The words "security theater" have been tossed around a lot lately, well this is nothing more than "rape prevention theater." The best prevention is harsh punishment of rapists, not the buddy system or a cheesy rap video telling you to help prevent assaults.
Completely. Until Monday night. I hope to find lots of juicy news (maybe even about new babies?) when I get back online.
Expect Put Da Team On My Back Doo, not to really put the team on his back but somehow manage to limit his opponent to a low amount of points. It must be pure intimidation. He holds the #1 defensive spot for limiting his opponents to an average of just over 100 over 14 weeks. In actuality, expect Brees to be done attacking the Vikings early and the saints to ride this one out easy, along with running backs Green-Ellis and Matthews at tough defenses of the ravens and jets. Also, Gayzer deserves to lose.
Thinking correctly means taking control over my thoughts. In my workplace, only the real “higher ups” have offices. The rest of us are resigned to cubicle life. This means that I hear everything — all types of conversations, jokes, laughter, and so on. A project manager moved two members of her team in close proximity to my cube, and the noise level rose tremendously. However, the thing that got on my nerves the most was their laughter. For the male, nothing was serious — everything was a joke, and for the female, I simply did not like the sound of her voice nor the way she laughed. In other words, her laughter got on my nerves.
Playfulness and whimsy are displayed in Babatunde's choice to have his protagonist rename himself "Bombay":
- Screw health packs! When B.J. has a few holes in him, he eats a chicken TV dinner or some dog food, and he's good to go.
For the loss of our own brother,
I am actually off this Mother's Day. I have had to work it for the past few years but I think Leap Year may have changed the weekend rotation up a bit for me.
Thee Mighty Caesars - Caesars Remains
Amy Winehouse - Live at Canal Plus, French TV, 2 november 2007
The key to the successful implementation of predictive analytics in marketing and pricing is for top management to commit to the process and to ensure that all data analysed is agreed beforehand. The Accenture authors call this a company-wide agreement to “one version of the truth”.
2) #3 South Carolina Gamecocks (SEC) @ #15 Clemson Tigers (ACC), Fri-Sun/Clemson, S.C.
Stolen from blackbird who stole from someone else... :)
When Next Limit announced the Educational Certification Scheme, the CDT expressed their interest, but despite the obvious benefits, the financial cost of certification was prohibitive.
She said, “why don’t search up something more common?”
In a baking dish, arrange the pear pieces and then pour the batter and bake for approximately an hour at 150 centigrades. Once your cake has risen and is ready (tooth pick test), bring it out and let it cool down for half an hour or so, before turning the cake upside down.
I know I visibly shuddered.
Questions? You betcha.
on proposed Street Parties.
looms. Some critics have seen J.M. Barrie's immortal boychild as
Oh, how lovely. At this point a spongebob song pops into my head about not being a jerk at Christmas. Why, oh why did I say I wanted it wrapped? Am I really that cheap that I don't want to go and buy a roll of wrap..... apparently.... since I don't love my friend enough to spend the kind of dough the lady thought I should on a gift. Well, people just keep coming up to the register. There are 3 cashiers and another employee that looks like she might be in charge but she was obsessed with the shopping carts. I started to notice that the cashier that was going to be wrapping my gift had a customer that just didn't seem to be leaving. Big surprise, he was having a problem with his purchase or return. What was my super efficient, multitasking of a cashier doing while waiting for 5 minutes for help? Nothing! Staring at the wall. This prompted me to stand in her line of sight to remind her that I had been waiting for 15 minutes now. Finally the lady that printed out the registry saw me standing there and offered to gift wrap my item so I could leave........You're eyes are not deceiving you. That is a plastic bag with a bow on the top complete with a gift tag.....the lady was sure to point out the lovely gift tag. Like I was going to commend her on her fine wrapping skills and what a wonder favor they were doing for me. Seriously! She even had the courtesy to ask if I wanted it in a shopping bag to keep it out of the rain. Really? Should I put my plastic bag inside another plastic bag to keep it from getting wet? I was really having to choke back going into a Lewis Black comedy skit about their crap for service! Why couldn't I say something? Why do we put up with this crap? We have been conditioned to think that it won't do any good anyway so why get upset. Well, I say it's time to start letting people know when they aren't performing to a higher level of expectation.
Plus, this is the week of the senior choir performance. An annual event at M’s school, the senior choir show is a big deal. The kids practice for months, they have specially designed t-shirts and all the grades attend the event at a near by middle school. M’s teacher is one of the organizers, so everyone in the class is pretty hyped. Although the show is several days away, combined with his anxiety about his EA’s absence, M was overwhelmed.
We are recording the record now near Philadelphia, and it'll probably come out in the Spring of 2011. Our friend Will Yip is recording it. The record's going to be our first full length, but we're not sure how many songs are going on it, the name of it, or details like that.
So yesterday, there were tears. Tears of sorrow and grief for what might have been. And then there was peace. I went to a meeting last night where I was instructed on how to be a better leader The speaker, President Porter, asked us a hard question. He said,
approvals from the ministry or the Federal executive council which
"So when do YOU go on stage?"
Most people are familiar with the wave of anthrax attacks waged against the United States in the weeks following September, 11. Beginning on September 18, a group of letters containing anthrax spores were mailed to US media outlets, and the offices of two US senators. In all, five people were killed in the terrorist activity, and seventeen others were seriously affected. The letters addressed to the US senators, Democrats Tom Daschle of South Dakota and Patrick Leahy of Vermont, were laced with a highly refined dry anthrax powder. Shortly after the first wave of attacks, two letters were sent to the New York Post and NBC News. The letters contained threats mentioning 9/11, and implied a new wave of terrorist activity. For this reason, it was highly reported in America that Al-Qaeda was behind the 2001 anthrax attacks.
4. Push The Venom 03:27
Among critics and scholars of American poetry, it has long been generally acknowledged, if less generally discussed, that Ezra Pound was the dominating influence upon the early poetics of William Carlos Williams. The irascible “missionary”—an epithet to which Pound himself admitted (see The Selected Letters of Ezra Pound: 1907-1941, in which Pound writes to George Santayana: “I plead the missionary sperrit: GUILTY!!”)—began what amounted to a personal jihad to convert Williams to his viewpoints. This effort began as early as their first encounters in the University of Pennsylvania dormitories and would last throughout Williams’ life. It is as if upon taking up his violin to antiphonally respond to the piano music of Morrison Robb Van Cleve—which led, a short while later, to his being introduced to Pound—Williams interned himself to a mentor more zealous and jealous than any university don or religious guru could have been. The relationship with Pound, unquestionably, was “a painful experience”—as Williams decries what it was like to listen to Pound read from the poems of A Lume Spento (Williams, The Autobiography). “…He bore with me for sixty years,” Pound confessed via cable upon hearing of Williams’ death.
Clay slicing blade
The Salafi movement is made up of extremely conservative Muslims increasingly known for their hateful rhetoric and attacks against churches in Egypt. The Salafis have used rumours of kidnappings or relationships between Christians and Muslims to incite other attacks against Christians.
- Matched, by Ally Condie and Allyson Braithwaite Condie
Crazy right? then why do we kill ourselves to get an A on that 60 question final? What has really been bothering me is that people hiring for internships are even extremely picky and want you to have experience. Wouldn’t an internship be the experience that we need?!
The vote's organising commission told Reuters they had defied gloomy forecasts of delays to deliver all voting materials on time for Sunday's deadline.
Do you still battle with your inner-children? You don’t have too. You can gain a great deal of understanding with therapy. Life is a battle to the end. I’m 45 yrs-old, which is 365 x 45. that’s how many days I’ve trained myself to act and react the way I do. With practice and training, I can learn to take one bite at a time, allow it to digest, and move forward with another notch of learning under my belt.
There over a period of time in foreign languages, mainly Asian and Arabic were inane remarks with links to other sites.
The vibrant atmosphere didn’t do much for me, but it was definitely on the ‘to-do’ list! Our first stop was a store that offered us amazing apple tea… and tiny bits of the favoured Turkish delight, or ‘lokum’ as it is commonly called. I loved the chocolate covered ones.. but don’t buy your stock of lokum from here, go get it from a store called ‘Gulluoglu’, right near the Grand Bazaar!
Cheryl McGeachan writes: Inside The Glasgow Film Theatre on Thursday evening a diverse mix of individuals crowded together for the sold-out UK premier of Luke Fowler’s new film All Divided Selves. Fowler’s piece, once again, takes Scottish born psychiatrist Ronald David Laing as its centrepiece, and yet this is a film about much more than the man himself. Throughout the carefully threaded together archival footage that wonderfully covers Laing’s journey from a psychiatrist working on publicising his first book, The Divided Self (1960), to the global explosion of his image as a counter-culture figure through The Politics of Experience (1967), this film also manages to become a carefully considered excavation into the heart of psychiatry itself. At times individuals experiencing extreme forms of mental ill-health are painfully stripped bare, revealing the real suffering that is experienced within and beyond the mental institution. However, these glimpses into the psychiatric profession of the past demonstrate the importance of its continued consideration in the present. In part, Fowler’s interest in Laing is due to the humanist approach he adopts and the challenges he poses to an establishment that he felt required internal and external reform. Although the image of Laing has been, arguably deservedly, critiqued his work continues to challenge and inspire those within and beyond the mental health profession, and Fowler’s work is an excellent example of this.
Everything You Need to Know About Adidas and Adidas Outlet
3-4 ice cubes
If the answer you can't coerce
(you know, i really do wonder WHY i thought a partners desk was a good idea...)
Happy Thursday, my dear friends! :o)
Preheat the oven to 325 degrees F. Line a 24 count regular-size cupcake pan with cupcake liners.
I’ve always loved to write—I was writing horse stories when I was six, and I was the only kid in school who got a maximum word count in school. I always dreamed of being a published author and even though the odds were against me (I got a LOT of rejections when I was first starting out) I never gave up on my dream. RIEVER’S HEART is Book 5 of the Guardians of Light series for Samhain Publishing! Can’t have Book 5 without Book 1. What if I’d given up? Quit? Never give up. Ever. No matter what other people say, you have to believe in yourself. Don’t ever listen to the naysayers. I hope Aryk’s and Verdeen’s story can inspire you to keep your own dreams alive.
Taste - Many times when you taste a beer it ends up not tasting like it smells. In this case the taste mirrored the aroma. You could taste the light smokiness and hints of coffee chocolate and roasted malts. This beer was very complex and everything worked together well.
The Wizard Crystals of the Elements have fallen into the hands of Abaddon, forever corrupted and transformed to evil. Abaddon now patiently waits in his northern kingdom for the coming of Saruinkai—the evening when the spirits of Darkness rule the night, and when he will unleash the Crystals' horrific powers against their own elements and sweep destruction across the earth.
This isn’t to say there weren’t some surprises and twists to find lying about. Some chocolate sculptures were on display, including an unnamed Chocolate Lab, a life-size jazz man made of fudge, several dresses made out of candy wrappers and even a game of hands-free doughnut-eating (hung above the contestants). Watching people struggle to chomp and talk while eating their doughnut only made me chuckle, thinking that this must be how dogs feel when we tease them with Beggin’ Strips.
Eyes Like Leaves: Tachyon trade paperback, February 2012, 313 pages, cover art by Lauren Kelly Small. Charles de Lint has been one of the leading authors in the fantasy field since his first full-length novel appeared in 1984. He has published some 70 books and won the World Fantasy Award among many other honors. Because of this distinguished record, we named Eyes Like Leaves one of our four top seeds in the Winter 2012 Battle of the Books.
And as he journeyed, he came near Damascus: and suddenly there shined round about him a light from heaven:
To me Obama’s like the bad boyfriend. He lies to you, cheats on you, forgets to call, but you just keep taking him back and making excuses. “Well, he can’t help it. He has to stand up to those mean Republicans.” Right?
Notice how rare it is that someone would say,” Of course I am being a jerk, but it is entirely justified!” People tend to just skip the middle part and focus on “I AM…JUSTIFIED!”
Sheila and Dale are his landlords.
“I’m sorry. I must have tripped or something. Are you ok?”
Nope, didn't happen.
products next
So, I will be away from writing while I sit here with my broken and impure heart before the throne of Yahweh. How long? Probably not too long, just till the sadness passes..
-Robin Willis, TPE design team
Pruner said buyers, sellers and agents are still waiting to find out where the bottom is for prices.
I received a request to review this book by the author Michael Cargill, it is a collection of three short stories; Shades of Grey, There and Back Again, and Down the Rabbit Hole.
One of the lighting cages suspended high above the crowd transformed into a helicopter, beaming out a powerful strobe of light and accompanied by reverberating sound effects. Regimental rows of boots and sickles marched across the wall, then the shadows of warplanes, then rows of crosses and headstones. A gigantic inflated black pig with tusks and burning eyes floated over the audience’s heads, just, just out of reach. When we couldn’t discern any cables or marionette strings, we realised it was being remote-controlled!
Nigeria Labour Congress (NLC) to
“Even his comment about the dogs – it might not literally mean that, it might mean something else, even though it is definitely not something positive.”
"Gone? What's gone? Who's gone?"
Stef.
WordPress or other blog communities are great. You can browse the blogs, see the lists by most recent posts, etc…I’ve only had 2 visitors come in from the WordPress search engine, but perhaps my titles are not eye catching enough. I’m not convinced the blog hosting communities are the place to grow a following, although I could likely benefit from interacting with them more. Finding like minded blogs, and commenting on their posts, and doing “link baits” back to me. But that is a topic for another day. The blog communities are a good place to grow, but I think most bloggers are a little preoccupied with their own blogs to be too “twitterpated” with following someone elses. I could be wrong tho.
Here are a few things to keep in mind when playing our challenges:
A song that resonated with me in my teens was Trooper’s ‘We’re here for a good time (not a long time).’ It was my credo.
To approach the topic from a different direction, the sense that there is some sort of core emotional seat of agency that can have an effect on my perceptions or actions.. that’s really quite foreign to me… I don’t have emotional responses to 98% of things initially–even really threatening or normally emotional things–at those moments–I become entirely emotionless, actually.. I become a robot.. or a demon ( more of a daemon or something like Felix’s “engine” in John Steakley’s novel Armor ) and I deal with the situation without any real emotional connection. It is only much later–if at all–that I register any kind of emotional response to the events that occurred priorly…
Between January and July 2009, Obama sent a bust of Winston Churchill back to the British embassy. He gave the Queen of England an iPod with 40 show tunes, photos of his inauguration, and two of his speeches. Former Prime Minister, Gordon Brown, was given a box set of 25 DVDs, all in a format that does not work in England. Later, eager to empty Guantanamo, he authorized the transfer of some detainees to a British protectorate, Bermuda, without consultation with the UK.
Rumours 12South is gone, a pile of rubble, a memory.
It does indeed suck that this is a zero-sum game (in fact, probably negative-sum). Sadly, from my view it looks like the ire surrounding JUICE would have been stoked and pointed at whoever won this contest. After all, astronomers have begun crying foul so loudly out of a justified fear for their own fields. Without ATHENA, X-Ray astronomy (a necessarily space-based pursuit) will struggle in the coming years. NGO was also a great white hope for the gravitational wave community, it being the survivor of LISA, a similar observatory which fizzled after NASA pulled out.
- Enes Kanter is the only player who wears multiple types of shoes.
Well if you don’t understand what i just did, I’ll just sum it up for you!
so maybe...
For a good example of in-your-face faux-White pro-jewish arrogance read just about anything written by The Undiscovered Jew. For example, see his comments at OneSTDV's "More Thoughts on White Ethnostate". For a double dose of faux-Whiteness see his exchange with Auster in Is human bio-diversity the next conservatism? I noted the strange humor they find in their own confused hypocrisy in A Moron Amused by a Fool Helping an Idiot.
‘Course I got a goal—stayin’ alive! When Mama was alive we was thinking we’d go to New York City so she could be a singing star, but that plan’s shot to hell, so stayin’ alive is the next best thing.
“My father had a completely different attitude and where he should have just shook people’s hands, he was very loud and it looked quite aggressive. But that’s just the Italian way. He’d teach people how to cook pasta correctly, and be stern because he heard they’d been putting ketchup on their pasta instead. So, it was a bit of a culture clash sometimes.” She describes how her father arrived in Iceland at a time when it was just countryside and there wasn’t even tarmac on the streets. “It’s incredible,” she grins. “I love that though. I’m very well connected with it.”
"I stood in that doorway, watching you dance, and you know what I was thinking?...I was thinking how pretty you were," he said. "Now, isn't that an odd thing for a father to think about his son? But that's what it was. I was standing there, watching you dance and twirl and move like that, and I was thinking to myself, Goddamn, I got me a pretty one."
Ron again texts someone on his phone again and another sales associate takes his cell phone out of his pocket, mid-sentence while with his customer. I see the smirk and watch him move his fingers in the same fashion over his screen. Ron looks back at his phone and smiles then, proceeds to type something back.
Privately, Marie Antoinette preferred foods which were much less extravagent than the court meals served at the grand couvert. She enjoyed meals of boiled or roasted white meat, especially chicken or fowl, accompanied by cooked vegetables. She was also fond of broths and simpler soups. She did not drink alcohol with much frequency, if at all, and preferred lemonade or water imported from Ville d’Avray for its purity. She also liked to dip small biscuits in her water or lemonade. She sometimes drank cow or donkey’s milk, especially for health purposes.
Do you have to make time to write, or have a set schedule; do you have any writing quirks?
Logged into the trading desk early last night and someone dumped just over 12 Million units of Morphite on the market in one massive dump in Jita and almost caused a panic. When I saw the current price it was way down to around 8K a unit. Was like wtf, prices keep dropping. Last week it was selling for around 15-16K. Sell Prices have rebounded slightly to 10K but seem few people willing to buy much on Buy Orders. Turmoil continues.
What was the live act that impressed you most or deepest? Was there an initial gig, that made you decide: I want to do the same/different/better?
Afternoon tea provided
Please let me know your thoughts on knowledge.
—Exerpt from The Magician’s Elephant
"It means you're not by yourself in rehearsals," Anita chimed in.
Hey Dad, is that you?
This is a big part of what motivates me about film preservation. It's not just about keeping a movie available to people to buy, or to make it look as good today as it did when it opened, or to generate new income for the folks who gambled on making it years ago. There's an old George Carlin joke: "Do you ever look at the crowds in old movies and wonder if they're dead yet?" Statistics say that many of them probably are. But their relatives are grateful to have that instant of their lives available to look at again over future generations. Films are not created in a vacuum, and even with CGI characters, somebody still has to model for the motion capture. There are hundreds of lives and stories tied into even the schlockiest of works, and to preserve the movie is to preserve the people.
I feel sad about it, you know. My younger siblings have all missed out. Not that I’m super patriotic and loved my daily dose of imperialism, but just that they’ve been born on the tail in of a golden age, and can’t remember it. I feel like they’re already more cynical than I was at their age. (“When I was your age, we didn’t own a computer! We lived in the park and ran around eating fresh blackberries off the bushes, hiking to beaches and losing ourselves in the forest!” “Yeah, well. You didn’t have Reddit.”)
My wife headed for the door laden with a couple of bags while I chased a frozen chicken around the car boot. I had finally grabbed it when a voice “halloed” behind me. I jumped banging my head on the boot lid. Turning around I saw Smith heading for his front door carrying a toolbox.
Thank you Facebook friends that immediately began to pray and spread the word about what was happening. So many of you shared and re-posted the prayer requests and updates so quickly that within an hour of hearing the news of Erin’s complications, I received notifications of hundreds of people praying. Those hundreds would literally turn into thousands over the next several days. People from all over this community, people from so many different phases of our lives, high school friends, college friends, bible study groups, churches all over the country (and some in other countries) that began to pray for our family. You pounded upon the doors of heaven for us and you changed things. Thank you!
Jessica Faust
Super simple and easy to make and practically zero costs.
As a photographer, think about how you are. Are you a mom? A professional photographer? A combination of the above? Think about who or what you shoot. Is it people, your kids, landscapes, light? What do you shoot with? Do you need to get a better lens, upgrade your camera, get better apps for your phone? It's your eye and creativity that makes you a photographer, so work with the tools you have. That's what's important.
This is done differently depending on whether your work is non-fiction or
Now, there may be items that you may want that are just a tad more expensive than you can afford in one go. Many places do have their own credit cards that you can open and offer some good financing. But you should not wait until the last minute to decide whether you want to do this or not (ex. deciding to open a new credit card at the register after the cashier tells you about it). You can get information about the credit card offers on each retailer website, along with the terms and conditions. Be sure to check up on any yearly fees. Some credit cards charge to have the line of credit open (with some being as much as $100/year). It is not worth it.
I stood to my feet and followed the caseworker through double doors, down a corridor, into another corridor and into a 10x10 deluxe cubicle suite smothered in the usual gray, black and taupe cliché of office themed colors. I maneuvered my size 8 waist around the front of the caseworker's desk and casually slumped into a chair obviously meant for overweight people. The blue-marooned Beta fish residing in a tall sitting vase to my left actually stopped swimming for a sec to look my way. I meant to smile, but the fish gulped and continued on swimming. Suddenly I felt minute like a leftover morsel of undigested fish food because I was finding it hard to believe that this insignificant little thing actually had a home that wasn't facing Foreclosure. I shot the shit with the caseworker for a few minutes to reclaim my confidence until he got to the embarrassing-but forgotten-issue at hand: “Why are you here, Mrs. Davis?”
Or hath he spoken and shall he not make it good”.
Sketchnotes serve a few purposes:
I hope all is well in your corner of the world and that you're having a beautiful weekend.
We had some lovely lovie creations but sadly only one winner this time
They couldn’t keep us out. Bobby found it. The gap. Right back there in the corner. Near the woods. One by one we scrambled under, working our way through. Jenny yelped as the wire claimed some hair. Blood trickled onto her muddy cheeks.
Sweat is dry and feet are in the sand
Every child is different, so every child will be affected differently by praise. I was a praised child. Praised for being well-behaved and praised for achievements, especially academic ones.
wallowing is all I will ever know.
Her favourite noise to make is a high pitched girly squeal.
For the rest of you I have virtual hugs, and if there's anything you wonder about, or anything particular thing you'd like to see 'pictured' (ah ah, now get your mind out of the gutter - there will be no porn here) I promise I will answer each and every comment, and if there are photo requests there will be a post for them.
....or "Undoing the damage Farno did to my psyche."
Ah, but reality beckons. Soon, its uncomfortable consequences will be in full bloom. If twenty-somethings ever figure out what government has set them up for, the counter-culture unrest of the 1960s may look a picnic.
9) rove
He said the police had done nothing to stop the land invasion at Winterskloof in Hilton.
Milk (With Sean Penn)
If nothing else, I’d at least like to thank Lower Dens for giving me the comedic fodder necessary to write this review. I couldn’t have done it without you guys.
Finding one of these iPad 2,4 variants is not easy, however. “If you’re in the market for an iPad 2, the 2,4 is clearly the one to get – if you can find one that is,” wrote Anand Shimpi.
After three rounds of telephone tag, my endocrinologist's nurse/manager finally called me at a time when I could answer my phone. (The messages we were leaving for each other would have been hilarious if they had not been so frustrating.) The conversation was brief; the nurse manager is refreshingly direct. It's all well and good that the biopsy came back negative, but given that my tumor marker is increasing, the endo wants me to have a PET scan.
The famous three-thirty itis, where we feel tired and lazy around the midafternoon. This ‘itis’ often stems from not a lack of sleep, but a slowing of the metabolism rate. As our metabolism slows we do not process fat, which is one of our primary sources of fuel for energy.
Currently, the only person authorized to approve adoptions for children in foster care is the Michigan Children’s Institute (MCI) superintendent. Since April 2010, the MCI superintendent has received 1,100 such cases for approval.
One day after Khutorskoi’s murder, Antifa activists used rocks and sticks to smash up the office of Young Russia, a pro-Kremlin youth group.
- Computer orientation course (2002)
After church, we popped some popcorn for a little snack. All of a sudden I hear, "Mom, it's stuck!" One of these babies was lodged in Cameron's nostril.
80. Kept somebody else's clothes you borrowed? - Not much of a clothes borrower. I've got a hard shape to match with anyone else!
That Nephi killed Laban was a historical necessity, and Nephi's hesitation came only because he did not understand that anything which is necessary is also right.
This language-learning memoir follows a familiar pattern. Chapters arranged around a linguistic expression are used to take the reader into the mentality of the native attitudes towards expression and mores, while the diligent foreigner slowly figures out meaning from babble and begins to be able to communicate with real people as classroom lessons and tapes give way to actual encounters on the street and in the market.
The procedure was tough,not to understand the method that was a piece of cake.. The Awakening procedure was painful.
happy because, well i got my blog back, with all of my past blogspots.
Author: Jane Austen
I'm almost jealous though at the way Henry looks at the cute little birdie (LOL).
A similar thing can be said of the “other-ed” feeling that dominates the emotional landscape of most groups: we can all learn to look beyond our current perspectives to recognize and value diversity in appearances, experiences, perspectives, etc. The Liberal Arts education provided in Ohio Wesleyan University gives every student a chance to challenge their own positions.
Mmmmmmmmmhhhh Nice!
1. If there are clouds, you wear boots and a peacoat like it is winter. This morning I woke up and there were clouds and a hint of drizzle. Even though it was warm, and it is still warm; women on campus are bundled up in knee-high boots, black pea coats and oversized sweaters. I get that it is good to be prepared for the weather, and based on the sky there is a good sign that rain is a possibility, but in San Diego the clouds can still mean hot muggy weather. But I guess if you are from San Diego hot+muggy+cloudy=winter attire.
DOC: Mm hm.
Dancing in shamanic alignment with the flows of energy within and without is the birthright of every human being. We do it whether or not we're in a mood to admit it, which makes every one of us a shaman.
The keyboard is another area to consider when buying a laptop. Why is the size of the keyboard important? A larger laptop will have a slightly larger keyboard area. But keep in mind that if you worry about your fingers or wrists taking on too much stress from typing on a keyboard that is too small, you may want this to be a main factor in your purchasing decision,
MacPherson also wants Laura, death be damned, and his quiet investigation of the apartment is a subtle piece of erotica created by Andrews. Andrews is silent, letting his face and body language communicate with us. Of this scene, Andrews’ daughter said it was her favorite piece of acting by her father. “He’s sniffing her lingerie drawer,” she said. And he looks great doing it; Muller correctly pointed out that “nobody wore a trenchcoat and hat better than Dana Andrews.”
But wait, that spot's already taken by the three year old, who's communicating that she'd rather not take her nap today. :)
NAME: Yosemite Sam
The next morning I got to show Leena Violet dog pen, the garden and such. Pretty much first thing in the morning Leena asks for some kind of fruit, it is so cute. She had a peach this morning. This was on our way out to the post office.
One fourth cup golden raisins
4. Make your lunch eco-friendly. Packing a lunch for you or your little ones? Use reusable plastic containers instead of plastic baggies or tin foil.
The trip to canton was a raving success the crowds the food ( yes I ate an entire funnel cake) it was everything I knew it would be! This was my second trip out and to be honest we would have to go several more times just to walk the entire grounds It was a blast!
Save for one particular day, it was getting late (I think it closed early on Saturdays at this point) and before my parents came and got me, I decided to visit the drug store two doors down to have a peak at his rack toy aisle (anyone else noticing a disturbing pattern with me?)
And now for pictures:
The sources at the network, who declined to identify the producer, said NBC News executives did not know the 911 call was misleadingly edited until news reports surfaced days later on right-leaning blogs including Newsbusters.org and Breitbart.com.
A recent national magazine gave these alarming figures: “More than 14 million children ages 6 to 13 now have working mothers, and it is estimated that a third of them are unsupervised for lengthy periods each day.” (U.S. News and World Report, 14 Sept. 1981, p. 42.)
**Really, the optimum is beef, diced into small pieces. Ground also works. The breasts here are the meat removed from the bones in the previous installment, ground by yours truly# with a knife and marinated overnight in salt, pepper, and sriracha sauce. The important thing to note here is that chicken breast meat is heavily suboptimal for this type of dish. Breast meat is extremely easy to overcook, not to mention not the most flavorful.
Climbing out of the Alexander Valley we reach a plateau, the Knight Valley, the smallest growing region in Sonoma. Then it’s through the Mayacamas Mountains and across the divide which separates Sonoma from Napa County. Mt. Saint Helena, a haunt of Robert Louis Stevenson’s, dominates the northern horizon.
The entire ordeal can be viewed in the video posted below.
Supplies - Card size is 6 1/2" x 4 3/4"
And at the final jump, the crowd and the competition all ready knew that the Austrians had won gold with such a huge lead. The only thing left now was to see just how far Gregor Schlierenzauer would jump. And when he took off, he soared higher and farther than anyone before him. And then he landed and almost fell! He crouched low and held his left hand out to keep his balance, but he didn't touch the snow! And when he stopped, his had flown 146.5m! And combined with his earlier jump of 140.5m, his total score was 290.1m, farther than Simon Ammann, the Swiss who won the individual large hill earlier two days before with a score of 283.6! An amazing jump and save by Gregor Schlierenzauer, and a wonderful finish for Germany and Norway.
These early in the season warm temperatures are not only inspiring florals to sprout in our gardens, but they're certainly on my interior horizon as well...
We sent out a reminder yesterday regarding the 18th Conference on Retrovirus and Opportunistic Infections scheduled to begin today, February 27th - March 2, 2011. There will be 2 poster presentations related to XMRV. http://retroconference.org/2011/display.asp?page=493
The lesson learned from this, if you foresee a future problem, do the necessary steps to fix it immediately or you might end up at 1:00 in the morning wondering what hit you.
infrastructure and that is
My french beans plant which was growing well, wilted within a day. Upon inspection, I noticed that the bottom stem has been snapped in two! How could this be? I then remembered that the day before, I saw the kittens was climbing on my belimbing tree, when they jumped down from the tree, they landed near my french beans, but I thought nothing of this! They must have snapped the stems when they landed!
A simple satin pair of ballerina pumps, dyed to match the colour of your dress, will suffice. But, if you want some bling to match your wedding ring, I’d suggest this sparkly, white, patent pair currently on sale in Fenwicks (Brent Cross Shopping Centre). Check out the faux diamonds and pearls… Even Prince (Symbol or whatever he’s called these days) would surely approve.
To some extent, we also get evidence of this when he bullies Ted into online dating and, after throwing a fake girl at him, gets him to agree to go on a few dates. While Marshall delves into full on panic mode over parenthood and Quinn makes Barney even more uncomfortable by recognizing some “clients” on the street, Ted goes on his first date…with Robyn.
"You are earwigging to Jonesys Jukebox"
that’s the direction of the relation
They’re a party on top. Disaster on the bottom…
Right on cue, the human bloodhound arrived at the bridge.
Again on Liberal Democrat Voice, Dominic Carman explains why he wants to be our candidate as Mayor of London. Whatever his faults, for many Lib Dem members he will have one overriding virtue: he is not Lembit Opik.
● Reserved seating throughout your break
At the same time, American and Israeli officials cautioned that they had found no evidence that Iranian operatives working in Lebanon launched the antiship missile themselves.
HBO does it right. I think their marketing over the last several years has been perfect, calling themselves a character-driven network. The characters on this show are incredibly complex and give the show a sense of realism that is lacking on so many other cop shows. Not to mention the pace of this show, due to it's one hour run time, giving a season somewhere around 12 - 13 hours of total runtime, as opposed to a network show that has a total season runtime of about 7 - 8 hours, allows the writers to create much more realistic timelines for drama to unfold, as opposed to the short episodic nature of the network cop shows that have to wrap everything up in half an hour.
2 drawn
And that's it! This wasn't a hard process, however, depending on how many dies you have, it can be a time-consuming one. But I am REALLY excited about this new storage system and think it was well-worth the time it took to complete! Nothing makes for a better paper-crafting experience than an organized craft room....and having a happy husband doesn't hurt either...right ladies?
To protest the continued development of nuclear weapons in the Bay Area and the United States, a demonstration called "For the Beauty of the Earth: Good Friday, Earth Day & The Bomb, The Cross in the Midst of Creation" was held at Livermore Nuclear Lab in Livermore on April 22nd. At dawn, an interfaith prayer service was followed by Stations of the Cross. The demonstration ended at the front gate with the mass arrest of approximately two dozen protesters who refused to stop blocking the entrance when ordered to by police.
gets heavier
It wasn't easy.
Kill the Messenger: The Media’s Role in the Fate of the World by Maria Armoudian ($25.00, Prometheus Books) explores a question of great importance insofar as print and broadcast media have played a role in three deadly conflicts, Nazi Germany, the former Yugoslavia, and Rwanda. The author documents how the media were used to spread hate that resulted in the Holocaust and the genocides in the latter two nations. Then she discusses how the media acted constructively, citing its role in the peace process in Northern Ireland, rebuilding democracy in Chile, and bridging ethnic divides in South Africa. This is an interesting exploration of how the media interact with psychological and cultural forces.
soup is simmering prepare pastry tops. On a floured work surface roll one of the pastry sheets into an 11-inch square. Cut out 4 pastry rounds, each about 5 1/2 inches in diameter (or 1/2-inch wider all around than the tops of the ramekins). Repeat with remaining pastry sheet. Cut a 1/2-inch circle in the center of each pastry round (a plain 1/2-inch pastry tip works well for cutting the hole). The hole will let the steam escape while the pastry bakes. Cover and
For many people, TLA are recognized not so much for their records, but for the fact that their lineup included the late Jay Bennett, who would eventually be a driving force in Wilco. At the time of this recording, TLA were merely a trio - Jay on guitar and vocals, Ken Hartz on bass and mic, and drummer Mike Hazelrigg, who parted ways by the time the group signed to Charisma Records. As you might expect, the material on Ice Cream Funeral is of a rawer persuasion than what their proper records would offer, but not by much. And of those "proper" records, I'm hosting two of them - the No Charisma ep that surfaced in 1992, and their 1996 parting shot Their Titanic Majesties Request. In closing I should mention that shortly before Bennett's passing it was rumored that an archival compilation of unreleased Titanic Love Affair recordings was being assembled, but my understanding is that those plans were shelved.
The realities of church, people and disappointment. I thought dysfunction would remain at home.
About Nancy:
Really? The Baltimore Orioles? One of four teams I figured would have a legitimate shot at losing 95 games this year?
Interviewer: But isn’t it considered a position of “general rule”?
Did you hear anyone mention anything about a bomb
the battle is won
And as if this weren't enough for one day, I sat down and did two hours' worth of work work yesterday evening so I could cross a few things off my never-ending "To Do" list.
“You might want to take your books with you,” the teacher said. “And your jacket. You probably won’t be back before the bell rings.”
Often referred to as the most liberal Democrat of the House Baldwin sponsored a resolution in 2010 opposing any government solution that grants criminal immunity to banks and banking officials.
Caetano Veloso- Irene
User Score: 9.3
Just like children on the wind.
Are you looking for the cheapest Acer laptops? Well you have come to the right place. Buying online will give you the cheapest deals, but you want to find a reputable online store that will give you a good discount off the retail price. This is why I have written this article.
Imtithal: What did you say? Are you making fun of me?
So I want to dream Yes to the Nietzsche’s question and ignore this the excuse function that we see in the 1990s irony and the aughts lovable failures. We need to look at things as they with respect that what we should reject. To put Nietzsche into the dialectical mode of Hegel: Amor Fati most be opposed by self-overcoming and sublated into something not yet seen.
Sriracha sauce****
Needless to say, I became much more interested in members of the opposite sex than my peers. And seeing as how the first girl I ever liked was also the first girl that I played Married with, I believed that it would be that easy from here on out. Find a girl, let her know that you like her, take off your clothes. But I was a frail kid, pale, with bad teeth, bad hair and thick glasses. Not only did this make me a repellent for females but it also made me the target of bullies.
Along with the society commentary about women and mystery surrounding Daniel, there’s also an element of romance in this novel, although it isn’t the focal point. Much as Lucy’s aims in life aren’t centred around falling in love, this novel doesn’t focus primarily on her love life. Despite this, I did enjoy the way that Lucy’s relationship with Will developed. She didn’t swoon or spend hours pining over him, but they clearly cared deeply for each other. Perhaps some romance readers will be disappointed that Lucy isn’t more enamoured with Will, but I found their relationship to be very realistic. It was nice to read about such a simple relationship that was complicated by external events, rather than misunderstandings or confused emotions.
6. Rescue Remedy: When I was a child, my mother used this on me whenever I was in an emotionally unstable situation. Two times I remember specifically include being stung by a bee and having some sort of panic attack at a store (I don’t remember the details). In both cases, I instantly began to calm down after taking the drops and within a few minutes was restored to a restful state. You cannot overdose and there are no side effects because it is made from flowers. Since there is alcohol in the original version (though minimal) they do make one for children without it.
= $4.99 +tax
Debut often recalls the early 70's jazz-fusion of bands like Weather Report. But where these fusionists combined jazz harmony with funk and acid rock, Björk marries her scat-vocalese and off-kilter melodies with the futuristic textures and programmed percussion of today's techno and acid house. In this vein, 'Aeroplane' is even more of a lush polyrhythmic jungle than 'One Day'. Its iridescent keyboards hark back to fusion players like Herbie Hancock and Joe Zawinul. 'Venus as a Boy' heads East for it’s exoticism: Talvin Singh's and Sureh Sathe's strings have the lavish, melodramatic quality of the orchestral soundtracks to Indian movie musicals.
Since the first decline, 1422-1357, took five tradings days. And this rally, 1357-1393, has also taken five trading days. They appear to be of the same wave degree. Therefore, we have upgraded the initial decline to an Intermediate wave A, and the current rally to Intermediate wave B. Project, monitor and adjust. This would suggest a declining Intermediate wave C should soon follow to end the correction. With Int. wave A travelling 65 points, Int. B could retrace 0.50% to 61.8% of the decline, or SPX 1390- 1397. The market hit that range today. Also, the upper limit of the 1386 pivot range is SPX 1393, which was today’s high. The next level to watch would be SPX 1402, or the high after the first three waves down from 1422. Short term support is at the 1386 and 1372 pivots, with resistance at SPX 1397, 1402, and then 1414. Short term momentum ended the day quite overbought. Best to your trading!
Pham the resident manager whose brother owns the park is quite a character, a Vietnamese boat person, survivor, conservative and the agile happy go lucky guy in charge who runs a safe place, "no trouble here." With the experiences of his life he has learned to enjoy one moment at a time. By our arrival I was beside myself, wondering how and where we were and was this trip worth it. Two minutes with Pham who encouraged us to stay the week, "more cheaper that way" I felt better. He later said, "I see you were trouble so I make you laugh." Perceptive person. Another of his favorite sayings, "Oh we gonna' be in deep deep trouble now."
You should be able to trust your agent's judgment - their judgment of your book and its place in the market, their judgment of whether you are being offered a good and realistic deal and their judgment of what is best for your long-term career. But if you think your agent is wrong, you must speak out. Don't make assumptions that they don't value you, don't harbour resentments - ask them to explain what they are doing. And if you still don't like it, it's time to move on. You haven't committed to your agent for life, for better or worse, richer or poorer. There is a termination clause in your contract, remember? You can give notice - probably three months - that you no longer want them to represent you. The books they already represent are likely to stay with them, but it's up to you what you do with future books once you have terminated the contract. It's wise, though, to end your relationship amicably. Don't hurl abuse at them and list their shortcomings. Remember that agents talk to one another and if you abuse one, another is less likely to take you on.
I started job hunting in December as an early jump on my New Year’s resolution, but due to various reasons too numerous to name, I have recently stepped up my job search. As of today, I have had 13 interviews: four with staffing agents; three phone interviews; and six in-person interviews. This week I had two in-person interviews.
She added, “…I believe in community-based politics and because I know from public health that community-based action works best. When it’s clear we’ve wrongly trusted our national government to defend our rights, you are the right council and the right people to take that action. You’re who I can reach.”
Caroline then sees Dr. David, the ex, who still vividly remembers being dumped by Caroline years ago. She asks him about Earl and he says he’ll see what he can do. Max and Caroline then take Earl to his private bedroom they call “Cribs: ICU Edition”. Back at the diner, Han’s hoping for a late Valentine’s Day crowd, but soon admits that it’s a bust and closes early to see Earl. At the hospital, Han is the first of the diner group to see Earl and Earl mistakes him for an angel (since he had wings on). Outside the room, Oleg gives Sophie some Valentine’s chocolates. Caroline goes to see David and they find out they both live in Williamsburg. Caroline asks him out, but David turns her down. David tells her he doesn’t see them happening again because of her father’s scandal and what people will think of them dating. When Caroline comes back and tells that to Max, Max goes down to talk to David before he leaves. Max asks David why he can’t be decent and tells him he made the biggest mistake of his life. Max then thanks him for taking care of Earl. Max also goes to the nurse and apologizes by giving him a heart shape candy. He asks her out and she says sure. Back at the apartment, Caroline tells Max that she used to feel bad for her since she didn’t know her dad, but now she feels bad for Max’s dad and says Max would have been a wonderful daughter. Sophie comes by and gives the girls flowers, one for Caroline from her dad and one for Max from Caroline’s dad. Max’s flowers come with a card thanking her for taking care of Caroline. The total for their cupcake shop is $865.
For instance, Onam, a Kerala festival, is an official holiday here; cow-slaughter is allowed (earlier it was banned); there is a disregard for local festivals; and local shrines are going bankrupt.
I have spent the better part of the hour on EdenFantasys website!! There are SOOO many things to look at and so many things to choose from! I LOVE IT! Okay, and let me be a bit honest here when I say, I am NOT the least bit adventurous when it comes to 'alone time' with my husband! lol I just cant let loose or get creative, Im really just not sure what the deal is, but there you have it, I am not adventurous. Much to my husbands dismay. So when I told my husband I would be doing a review for this company, you can imagine his genuine SHOCK and after the shock came the laughing at me and saying ya right. lol I cant blame him. Men are just way more open when it comes to things like this, and maybe there are a lot of women who are too, I dont know, I just know that I unforunately am not one of those women.
Charmer!!
Once upon a time, I was fairly romantic. Yes, it's true. Crazy, right? I used to be creative about dates, and would write love notes and poems. After I got married, I wanted to carry on the same type of creative romantic traditions. After we were married a month, I cooked a romantic candlelit dinner. You know to celebrate one month. I was excited, this was special. But my dear husband didn't get it...He said, "Are you going to do this EVERY month we are married?" He was young (23) and immature, but it was then that I realized he didn't really care about all the extra fluff. All that effort I went through was not appreciated in the way I had hoped. After getting over the hurt, I realized it was not his love language, and over the years, it is no longer my love language either.
It was so nice to sing in English, here the preaching in English without an interpretor and not on my iPod. Later I bowed my head in prayer with two other ladies with no fear of mispronunciations. And no need to think about how I would conjugate a verb or choose the correct word. The people in this church have been so welcoming to our family. They have provided food and meals for us. The teens have included our teens. The children have made friends. And the nursery workers were patient with little Silas' Spanish and English even though his mommy (aka Me) forgot to tell them that he usually asks for things in Spanish.
Despite the statistics of cold cases, Dylan Scott wants to believe the young woman’s alive – and not just because her father, his client, is desperate to find his missing daughter before he dies of cancer. By all accounts Sam was a lovely girl, devoted to her younger stepsisters, well-liked at her work, in love with her boyfriend.
Hello Happy Monday!! How are you?? I am Great!!!
This system was OK when it really was Highland Park. Then all of this was in the open and accepted as such. People also got paid well. Now all of this is obscured behind a touchy feely facade. On the surface we are all one big happy family. We need your ideas. Innovation is what it is all about. We are all going to cooperate. We are all leaders. This will be bottom up.
Autism Spectrum Disorders (ASDs) fall under the umbrella known as Pervasive Developmental Disorders. Several types of ASDs have been identified, and it is most helpful to think of them as falling on a continuum.
Also for schools and institutions the “Piracy Deterrence in Education” is too vague, and could include material stored on computers and shared on networks, bringing those institutions in big problems.
I hope this made you smile and took you away from anything that might be dragging you down.
I took a deep breath and said, “Kindness. I’m going to talk about kindness.”
It’s been quite awhile since I’ve last posted – forgive me for I am a busy human being! I’ve actually been meaning to make this fashion post for awhile, but I’m glad I waited for today – because this Aussie based site has been posting ALL DAY yesterday and now it’s my turn (darn you international time zones)! WARNING: This post is about women’s clothing – but I do suppose it serves as fan service to you dudes.
“It’s a little surprising because we thought bidding wars were done with,” Andy Aley, a home shopper in Seattle said. Aley says he was outbid on a home earlier this year, even though he offered to pay $23,000 above the listing price and also waive inspections and other closing conditions.
Yeah, we have more disembodied heads on beheaded bodies, placed at odd angles on an artificial surface which completely ignores human physics and sand displacement. But what sets THIS one apart? The gigantic, inhuman smile on Bill H. Macy's face. I know this is out of the ordinary for me to do this, but I just gotta prove this one to you.
The theme for Law Day 2012 is “No Courts, No Justice, No Freedom,” with the goal of highlighting the importance of the court system and the seriousness of the funding shortfalls that endanger the ability of the court system to provide access to justice.
Pros: Kids will have to spend more time outside and less trying to get into the televisions; empathy; they want one; we have a really big yard now; I've managed to put it off for about 8 years.
My mornings are usually taken up by getting me and the two kids ready before having to take Little Butt to school, so I tend to start setting up my blog posts the night before.
You were my fire – So I burned - Til there was nothing left of me – I touched your face - I held you close – Til I could barely breathe
7.Pale Dream - 02:35
As I write to you I’m resting in my bed reveling in your spritely flutters and wiggles. I think of your sweetest little cheeks, your tiny button nose and your beautiful little eyes. Those beautiful little eyes that I dream will one day soon look up at your Mommy and Daddy expecting nothing but love. We have an over abundance of love for you, sweet Nora, if only that were enough.
Thank you for reading and commenting, you make me so happy :)
to kneel on her greens,
Dried basil and oregano
Can't tell you how excited I was to learn this information.
Where his viciousness will be truly appreciated.
Government guidance Because of the potential environmental impact of businesses failing to store hazardous substances safely. It’s a topic that’s always a top priority for both the environmental enforcement bodies and the Health & Safety Executive. As such, masses of information is available on the subject. Unfortunately, much of it is pretty tricky to decipher. However, in a bid to make this information easier to understand, the government has produced an online tool.
Yes, the words of Christ’s ascension are simple, but they are also profound, as R. C. Sproul has noted:
The bulk of the set was of course extracts from Let England Shake but there was plenty from the back catalogue; in fact the performance will send me back to some of the songs again, as they seemed to sound significantly different from my memory of them. The strange, ethereal melancholy of some of the material on Let England Shake and White Chalk was augmented by the percussion and guitars and had far more weight and solidity than I remember.
- Mark Twain
We think that we’ll live to fight another day
Since school started my son is back to daily meltdowns. They last somewhere between 45 minutes and 3 hours and have included furniture breaking, throwing things, cursing at me, and always lots and lots of yelling at me and blaming me for ruining his life.
The mouth of the righteous is a fountain of life (Proverbs 10.11)
To that end, a distinguished peer review panel has been assembled, consisting of some of the world's most eminent zoologists and associated researchers in their respective fields. And I am honoured to have been invited by the journal's originator and publisher, CFZ Press, to become Editor - an invitation that I am delighted to accept.
They were away for a total of 31 days and all returned safe and sound, a lot fitter and a little thinner, full of stories of their adventures.
Last night was not my favorite. (If you don’t know, we have seven week old twins…enough said.) I struggled to get out of bed this morning, motivated solely by the little beeping sound of my coffee maker reminding me that there are still wonderful things in life to be enjoyed, even when you’re exhausted and feel like death. I pour a cup, sit down and decide to digitally reach out into the world by checking my twitter feed. Only to be struck upside the head by this tweet from Dr. John Piper,
First of all, thanks to all of you for your comments, it was great to read all the differing views. That's what I love about this wonderful world called Blogger!
Cold Grey Stones contains eleven stories that range from quite long, almost novella-length, to just short vignettes. In subject they range from horror to fantasy. While I liked all of them, I did have some favourites, but what bound all of them together was the wonderful quality of the writing. For some of the more modern stories, the style was crisp and contemporary, but many of the stories included in this collection have an almost fairytale-like quality to them, which I really enjoyed. Lee's use of language ranges from the sharp and angular (Killing Her) to the poetic (The Heart of Ice), but they all convey a mastery of language and a facility with words, which makes reading these stories such a lovely experience.
So let’s go back to the last day of 2011 for just a second. Back in June, I’d been excited over those 1500 total hits to this blog. On the last day of the year, watching with morbid fascination, I was terribly excited to watch that count tick over from 9999 to 10000 hits.
Maxime’s show in Le Marais was held very near Carreau du Temple, a covered market situated on the former site of the Temple Prison, where the Royal family was held during the French Revolution. Marie-Antoinette was herself tried, convicted of treason and driven through Paris in an open cart, wearing a simple white dress. She was executed at the Place de la Révolution (present-day Place de la Concorde). I cannot fully imagine the effect the collection had on the French observers at the show, but I knew Maxime’s reveal was poignant: the final elegant dress of chains released in close proximity to the sites of great revolutionary consequence.
Anyway, hope you enjoyed this little peek. Hopefully I'll have a photo of this painting hanging in the living room it's going in pretty soon here. Happy Friday!
4) Olive Oil
The beer is not the only thing worth raving about with A Saison Darkly. Even the packaging of this beer is unique. The label artwork is done by tattoo artist Lee Versoza.
He saw his father take off running down the road, tears streaming, and practically tackle him in the biggest bear hug ever in human history.
that you surgically grafted under my skin,
a grumbling mind
the USPS thought it was broken. (I forgot to take a photo of it -- I will post a photo of the card with
- Cuanto cuesta “X”?- How can I get to “X place”?
Even though these were completed back in June, they've not yet been revealed here and each one of these babies is a gem, so I don't want to leave any out!
Sometimes it's rough being a geeky parent in these non-geeky times. But sometimes, just sometimes, it's a blast.
about your letter.
If we could get every radio station in Acadiana to carry his Sunday morning show – I would not have to hang-over fumble with the tiny dial on our kitchen radio.
I made a Mickey Mouse can because one of my kids teacher loves Mickey Mouse and she can use it in her room for supplies. I used a paint can, embellishments, and mickey mouse paper.
It doesn’t even fit the genre. Sure, Mario rescued the Princess, but he doesn’t marry her. At best, she non-metaphorically bakes him a cake.
Chef, started Veg Advantage, has worked with top restaurants, hotels, PETA, and Oprah Winfrey.
They must have brought him in. Some kind of scared straight deal.
*sigh* But I was rooting for those dainty little out-of-season quince buds.
Let Me sit beside you as you weep
Except for the part that I’m still burping donuts and lard, it was amazing.
As a result, this thing shines - warts (beer too) and all. One minor issue is that the sheets of feedback embedded in quite a few of the songs - audible on the original CD, but subsumed under the din - are brought almost too far forward in my version. It's not something I've been able to solve, but then again, it was presumably present at the gig, too.
MaNiC
This beautiful, rich impression of Saint Jerome in His Study, expertly printed with subtle areas of surface tone, is among the earliest taken from the plate. The careful attention given to the selection of papers and preparation of inks for his engravings strongly suggests Dürer printed his own plates. The artist issued his engravings in limited numbers in response to demand, and as a consequence a qualitative difference can be discerned between various printings. Later impressions can be distinguished from the earliest ones by the progressive dulling of lines and accumulation of scratches in the plate. Here, even the finest and most delicate lines print sharply, rendering a tonal range extending from soft silver to brilliant black to express the play of shimmering light in its most refined nuances. This sheet is also remarkable for its pristine condition. Its survival through five hundred years guarded from even minimal creases, tears, or stains is testament to the high regard in which it was held by its successive owners.
It warns of ‘pop-up’ and splinter demos that could occur at any time, especially during the evening.
There were 6 amazing gardens on the tour, so I will divide the pictures up that way and make it a little easier to follow along. I just wish I could post all the photos I took, but there were WAY to many for that.
Its Xmas day in a suburban Tasmanian town. In the middle distance 2wo surfers sit on the beach in awe of the beautiful scenery and of course their own fancy haircuts. As for me and my family, after we piled into the family Kia Rio and listened to one of my more "Weary Willie" CDs (c Mum who thinks I only listen to whingy whiny indie females) and after a drive that consists of no fewer than 2wo arguments about cheese, we're guests in other people’s lives for the day. We have gathered around an increasingly cramped gently decorated wooden table to eat turkey and to exchange whimsical variations of an answer to life’s eternal question - "how's work going?".
Author : Nymph
637 - Bill Almon
These stats are more than enough of a reason to ask ourselves what can we do about it.
27 in line of Greene’s laws of Power states that one should use peoples’ inherent need to ‘believe’ to create a cult following. Indeed as we have witnessed time and again that a state of national confabulation exists where anyone with a fiery story and mic stands up to fill the missing gaps of logic memory and reason that we as a nation lack. Difai Pakistan is one such escape route for the headless chicken bandwagon that needs something to believe in and that Pakistan is under attack from all corners of the earth is plausible when so many matters of internal strife tend to bamboozle one of out their wits. Perhaps it is time someone stands up to the right wing and tempers the narrative out,the onus for this lies with everyone,it’s high time Pakistan stopped viewing itself as the starry eyed damsel in distress waiting for its knight in shining armor General Hamid Gul and troupe to save her from the fire breathing dragon next door.
That was apart from breaking my tooth at the start of the show, and when Mylo's bunny fell from our spot at the top of the bleachers through to the muddy ground below and we had to retrieve him, muddy face and all. Luckily, one of the circus workers tramped around the back of the tent in her big gumboots to rescue him as I'd taken two steps in my newish boots and nearly sunk to my knees in the mud!
Now we could find several examples in the Bible, we find a young man called Philip in Act 6 v 1-6
For those who don’t know how a Hadith is composed (or what it is at all), then let me explain. A Hadith is an account prescribed Muhammad or one of those close to him. It consists of the chain, linking the teller of the Hadith back to the person ascribed the Hadith. This is called the Isnad, chain. The message in the Hadith is called Matn.
If you feel like you are on a roller coaster, that is to be expected. Any good business generally starts that way, and things change as you go along. My biggest piece of advice for dealing with this is: If you start feeling disappointed, take action. Ask for advice; make adjustments and work on new ideas.
“People on death row go through years of isolation and uncertainty. This is when justice becomes torture”.
and really hope you like them as much as I do!
Whatever the real truth the planners displayed an amazing lack of foresight when it came to the growth in road traffic and road transport. The motorway around Newport was rich in junctions which meant that people used it to get from one side of town to the other side – this added to congestion problems at peak times (around 40% of people using the M4 around Newport are making local journeys).
We’ll wish you ten times more.
-a.
At the moment we are in discussion with several publishers for different markets across the world, including the U.S.
My top 3:
So, I'd like to share with you what I have learned from my three trials and errors and successes, and what I will now be implementing with my fourth round of age three.
This project mirrors my earlier "I'm Late" page. Frabjous day saw the death of the Jabberwocky, so I have him "trapped" under glass on the chessboard. The red and white floral crowns denote which side of the chessboard each queen challenged from, along with the champion. This was such a fun page to work up - I hope you enjoy it!
I'm trying to be asleep
I had no choice but rest, I could not manage anything else, and wait, for better days. On the bad days, it is easy to think better days will not come, but they do. It will be a “new” better though.
IV. The gracious hand of God is on me, or my life would have completely fallen apart by now = my marriage dissolved, my sanity up a creek, my relationship with my parents’ perhaps destroyed, friendships lost, my faith lost, my children off the deep end. Instead, He has held all of that together for me when I could not.
As above, so below.
I have other ten thousand photos from the past twelve months.
Our last mobile survey highlight discussed the value of website visitors from mobile devices and how mobile-optimized websites help publishers capitalize on those visitors.
Teeth-Four, two top and two bottom. Little stinker doesn't seem to want to get anymore.
Also: get in touch if you have ideas for new work, contacts for other artists that you think we should contact, ideas around the theme that you’d like us to know about ….
I think kids are fascinated by the unknown – the monsters under the bed – and they haven’t yet fully formed that sensible, boring part we adults have that tells us not to be so silly, and that there’s nothing to be afraid of.
Curtain-raiser A story that leads into an event and previews it
28. Green Bay Packers OLB Zach Brown (UNC) The Pack saved their worst performance for last, their defense finally was their demise while their offense faired no better. OLB is a position that enables them to take heat of Clay Matthews and again put pressure on the opposing QB. Injuries on the D was not helpful either.
But because my blog is my place to vent, I’ll vent.
At the same time the Things were Hording, Ron was running a Killzone game on another table. I don't know the details but it seemed to be something like a cross between Killzone, Toon and the movie The Running Man. There were various anthropomorphic gangs (rabbit gang, frog gang, etc. all with shotguns, pistols, etc.) competing in a futuristic televised gladiatorial type competition.
Hi crafty friends! The mojo is returning... the stamping goddesses are smiling... the color story this week in the Cafe is perfectly rich and wonderful. We hope you'll join us this week for these regal colors...
That you can say to me,
OK, so they finally changed the light bulb over the men’s sink at work on Monday. Not bad, only a week later. It was so dark in there, I washed other people’s hands by mistake. I hope they don’t report me to HR. The new bulb seems brighter. Well, yeah brighter than the bulb being defunct but I mean brighter than when a bulb existed. Now instead of a flashlight we need sunglasses. Perhaps my brightness-opinion is a little off because it was dark for so long. By the way, I really didn’t think I’d have so much to say about a bulb at work.
A final word on the outcome of the TotMom Debacle, due you of course, since my last two entries centered on crude circus behavior - now that the object of hatred for the mass mind, fundamentally inspired by gnashing pundits themselves twisted by their own wishful thinking, seeking higher and higher ratings and vast acknowledgement of their celebrity appeal, stumbling over one another analyzing every facial tick and supposed legal trick delivered at ear-torturing volume with over zealous beached hair jobs, Korean nails, stark evidence of various youth-preserving cosmetic surgeries and an astounding absence of sensitivity toward their fellows has been found Not Guilty and will NOT be lethally injected, law enforcement has roadblocked entry into the family's suburban Orlando neighborhood, obviously the mass mind is clamoring excitedly for a little Strange Fruit. But who are they angry with now? Can it be they are suddenly left lacking an object of hatred, can it be they will now have to look to themselves and the absurd situations in which they exist, unemployed and underwater, facing diminishing resources and expiring incomes, empty dreams and giant metal pods sitting on dehydrating front lawns jammed to the gills with stuff they have no use for now and never did? Oh, of course not...
Here is more from Josi's life. Beneath this are two earlier extracts. Final one tomorrow.
“All these have allowed interest rates, inflation and unemployment to remain low. The Bursa Malaysia Composite Index also reflects the country’s tremendous economic growth, reaching its highest level recently,” he said.
I can't really remember what we did throughout the days other then shopping, eating, shopping, eating, shopping then eating again. XD Thanks to our stay at Rainbow hotel again~ Ximending is THE best place to shop IMO~ XD
Of course, the repro was the blue box. To our, then 20th century, gaze it was small, neat, tidy. And so pretty!
Chlamydia epidemics in Australia
The IFE is very strongly linked to a group called the Osmani Trust. During Lutfur Rahman's tenure as Leader of Tower Hamlets Council he gave £3million in local tax payers money to the East London Mosque to fund the building of the enormous "London Muslim Centre" where the IFE is now based. He also gave half a million to the Osmani Trust, a group that wants to take "ex gang leaders" off the streets and turn them into people who can, among other things, enforce Sharia Law amongst the local population; Muslim and non-Muslim alike. Great, so local thugs used to knifing people in the park will now be trained to patrol the streets telling women to wear a burha and all this is paid for by me, a local taxpayer. O super.
WLAN Wi-Fi®
730AM – eat eat eat eat eat
March 28 2012 at 03:35pm
Nation of Israel
At a young age Melissa Creede became an expert in her field. When she joined Delphi Group in 1997, an environmental consulting firm, she encountered the emerging discussions about climate change and was hooked. The issue was like a well-plotted novel; there were characters, money, politics, technology and an international appeal.
